Missouri, session 2026, SB890.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 23.295, 160.575, 173.240, 178.550,
178.585, 186.019, 192.131, 192.667, 192.700, 192.703, 192.707,
192.710, 192.712, 192.714, 192.716, 192.718, 192.720, 192.723,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SS SCS SB 890 2
192.725, 196.1103, 196.1106, 196.1112, 196.1118, 196.1121,
196.1124, 196.1127, 197.165, 208.530, 208.533, 208.535,
208.850, 208.853, 208.856, 208.859, 208.862, 208.865, 208.868,
208.871, 209.285, 209.287, 209.292, 209.299, 209.305, 209.307,
209.309, 209.317, 209.318, 209.321, 209.322, 210.102, 261.235,
288.040, 620.010, 620.484, 620.490, 620.511, 620.512, 620.513,
643.173, and 650.125, RSMo, and section 167.910 as enacted by
house bill no. 1606, ninety-ninth general assembly, second
regular session, section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no.
1415, ninety-ninth general assembly, second regular session,
section 196.1109 as enacted by senate bill no. 7, ninety-sixth
general assembly, first extraordinary session, section 196.1109
as enacted by house bill no. 688, ninety-second general
assembly, first regular session, section 196.1115 as enacted by
senate bill no. 7, ninety-sixth general assembly, first
extraordinary session, and section 196.1115 as enacted by house
bill no. 688, ninety-second general assembly, first regular
session, are repealed and thirty-eight new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 23.295, 105.1650, 160.575,
173.240, 173.2565, 173.2566, 173.2570, 173.2571, 173.2572,
178.550, 178.585, 186.019, 192.131, 192.667, 192.700, 192.703,
192.714, 196.1106, 196.1109, 196.1112, 196.1115, 196.1118,
196.1121, 196.1127, 209.285, 209.292, 209.299, 209.305,
209.307, 209.309, 209.317, 209.318, 209.321, 209.322, 261.235,
288.040, 620.010, and 643.173, to read as follows:
23.295. If an employee is displaced because a program
is sunset, reorganized, or continued, the state agency and
the [division] office of workforce development in the
department of [economic] higher education and workforce
development shall make a reasonable effort to relocate the
displaced employee.

SS SCS SB 890 3
105.1650. Every state department with oversight of an
administrative entity shall annually compile a report of all
such administrative entities that have not convened a public
meeting or conducted public business for the most recent
three-year period. Each department shall send the initial
report to each member of the general assembly by October 1,
2026, and by every October first thereafter. Such report
shall describe each administrative entity that has not met
or conducted any public business over the most recent three-
year period and the statutory or administrative mission of
such administrative entity. The report shall also describe
if the duties of the administrative entity are being, or
could be, performed by another administrative entity.
160.575. 1. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop a "ready to work"
endorsement program that enables high schools to endorse a
certificate for students who meet certain standards that
demonstrate that such students are deemed ready to work.
The program shall be available no later than June 30, 2007.
2. The program shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(1) Voluntary participation by high school seniors who
choose to participate;
(2) Academic components;
(3) Work readiness components;
(4) Assessment tools and techniques for a third-party,
independent, and objective assessment and endorsement of
individual student achievement through an existing workforce
investment service delivery system; and
(5) An easily identifiable guarantee to potential
employers that the entry-level employee is ready to work.

SS SCS SB 890 4
3. In developing such standards, the department shall
involve representatives of the [division] office of
workforce development, employers, students, career center
providers, local workforce investment boards, and school
district personnel.
173.240. 1. There is hereby established within the
department of higher education and workforce development a
"Minority and Underrepresented Environmental Literacy
Program". The department of higher education and workforce
development, hereafter referred to as the department, may
award scholarships to minority and underrepresented students
to pursue environmentally related courses of study. The
scholarships shall be administered by the department
recruitment and retention program [under the supervision of
the minority environmental literacy advisory committee
established under this section]. Those ethnic groups which
are most severely underrepresented, as determined by data
gathered and maintained by the National Academy of Sciences,
shall receive priority in annual selection.
2. For the purpose of increasing the number of
minority and underrepresented students, as determined by the
National Academy of Sciences, who are enrolled in
environmentally related courses of study, there is hereby
created a "Recruitment and Retention Scholarship Fund". Any
unexpended balance in the recruitment and retention
scholarship fund shall not be subject to biennial transfer
under the provisions of section 33.080. All interest earned
on funds in the recruitment and retention scholarship fund
shall accrue to the fund.
3. The general assembly may appropriate funds to the
department for the purpose of funding scholarships as
authorized by this section. Such funds shall be from

SS SCS SB 890 5
general revenue, special fees administered by the
department, federal funding sources, gifts, or donations,
provided that such funds may be used for this purpose. All
sums received for this purpose shall be placed in the state
treasury and credited to the recruitment and retention
scholarship fund.
4. The department shall accept, receive and administer
grants or other funds, gifts, or donations from the public
and individuals, including the federal government, for the
purpose of funding scholarships under this section. Such
funds shall be deposited in the recruitment and retention
scholarship fund.
5. The department shall promulgate rules to administer
the scholarship program, which shall include qualifications,
application forms, annual filing deadlines, and scholarship
amounts. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2010, shall be invalid and void.
6. The scholarship program shall be directed toward
students in the following areas of study:
(1) Engineering students pursuing an environmental
course of study through undergraduate and graduate degrees

SS SCS SB 890 6
in civil, chemical, mechanical, environmental, or biological
engineering;
(2) Environmental sciences students pursuing
undergraduate and graduate degrees in geology, biology,
wildlife management, planning, natural resources, or a
closely related course of study;
(3) Chemistry students pursuing undergraduate and
graduate degrees in the field of environmental chemistry; and
(4) Law enforcement students pursuing undergraduate
and graduate degrees in environmental law enforcement.
[7. There is hereby created a "Minority Environmental
Literacy Advisory Committee", hereafter referred to as the
committee, to be comprised of:
(1) The commissioner of higher education or the
commissioner's designee, who will serve as chairperson of
the committee;
(2) Three representatives of universities and
colleges. The universities and colleges shall be selected
by the department, with the approval of the director of the
department of natural resources. The university and college
representatives shall each be appointed by the affirmative
action office of the respective institution;
(3) The director of the department of natural
resources or the director's designee;
(4) Five at-large members appointed by the governor,
with the advice and consent of the senate, who shall be high
school teachers and college professors and who shall be
selected to represent the various regions of the state;
(5) The state affirmative action officer.
8. The committee shall meet at least annually, at a
time and place to be determined by the chairperson, to
select students to receive scholarships from applications

SS SCS SB 890 7
filed with the department retention and recruitment
program. The members appointed by the governor shall be
reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses.
9. Colleges and universities described in this section
shall include public community colleges.]
[620.484.] 173.2565. The provisions of the Wagner-
Peyser Act (29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 49 et seq.), as amended, are
hereby accepted by this state and the [division] office of
workforce development of the department of [economic] higher
education and workforce development is hereby designated and
constituted the agency of this state for the purposes of
said act. The [division] office shall establish and
maintain free public employment offices in such number and
in such places as may be necessary for the proper
administration of this chapter and for the purposes of
performing such functions as are within the purview of the
Wagner-Peyser Act.
[620.490.] 173.2566. The department of [economic]
higher education and workforce development shall promulgate
rules providing for the coordination of state and federal
job training resources administered by the department of
[economic] higher education and workforce development,
including the local workforce investment areas established
in the state to administer federal funds pursuant to the
federal Workforce [Investment] Innovation and Opportunity
Act (WIOA), Pub. L. 113-128, as amended, or its successor,
for the provision of assistance to businesses in this state
relating to the creation of new jobs in the state. The
department shall include in these rules the methods to be
followed by any business engaged in the creation of new jobs
in state to ensure that economically disadvantaged citizens
receive opportunities for employment in the new jobs

SS SCS SB 890 8
created. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant
to the authority of this section shall become effective
unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
section 536.024.
[620.511.] 173.2570. 1. There is hereby established
the "Missouri Workforce Development Board", formerly known
as the Missouri workforce investment board, and hereinafter
referred to as "the board" in sections [620.511 to 620.513]
173.2570 to 173.2572.
2. The purpose of the board is to provide workforce
investment activities, through statewide and local workforce
investment systems, that increase the employment, retention,
and earnings of participants, and increase occupational
skill attainment by participants, and, as a result, improve
the quality of the workforce, reduce welfare dependency, and
enhance the productivity and competitiveness of the state of
Missouri. The board shall be the state's advisory board
pertaining to workforce preparation policy.
3. The board shall meet the requirements of the
federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act,
hereinafter referred to as the "WIOA", P.L. 113-128, as
amended. Should another federal law supplant the WIOA, all
references in sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2570 to
173.2572 to the WIOA shall apply as well to the new federal
law.
4. Composition of the board shall comply with the
WIOA. Board members appointed by the governor shall be
subject to the advice and consent of the senate. Consistent
with the requirements of the WIOA, the governor shall
designate one member of the board to be its chairperson.
5. Each member of the board shall serve for a term of
four years, subject to the pleasure of the governor, and

SS SCS SB 890 9
until a successor is duly appointed. In the event of a
vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment and said replacement
shall serve the remainder of the original appointee's
unexpired term.
6. Of the members initially appointed to the WIOA,
formerly known as the WIA, board, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of four years, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of three years, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of two years, and one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of one year.
7. WIOA board members shall receive no compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually
incurred in the performance of their duties.
8. The department may include on its website a list of
the names of the members of the board, including the names
of members of local workforce development boards, along with
information on how to contact such boards.
[620.512.] 173.2571. 1. The board shall establish
bylaws governing its organization, operation, and procedure
consistent with sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2570 to
173.2572, and consistent with the WIOA.
2. The board shall meet at least four times each year
at the call of the chairperson.
3. In order to assure objective management and
oversight, the board shall not operate programs or provide
services directly to eligible participants, but shall exist
solely to plan, coordinate, and monitor the provisions of
such programs and services. A member of the board may not
vote on a matter under consideration by the board that
regards the provision of services by the member or by an
entity that the member represents or would provide direct

SS SCS SB 890 10
financial benefit to the member or the immediate family of
the member. A member of the board may not engage in any
other activity determined by the governor to constitute a
conflict of interest.
4. The composition and the roles and responsibilities
of the board membership may be amended to comply with any
succeeding federal or state legislative or regulatory
requirements governing workforce investment activities,
except that the procedure for such change shall be outlined
in state rules and regulations and adopted in the bylaws of
the board.
5. The department of [economic] higher education and
workforce development, office of workforce development,
shall provide professional, technical, and clerical staff
for the board.
6. The board may promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary to administer the provisions of sections [620.511
to 620.513] 173.2570 to 173.2572. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
[620.513.] 173.2572. 1. The board shall assist the
governor with the functions described in Section 101(d) of

SS SCS SB 890 11
the WIOA, 29 U.S.C. Section [311d] 3111(d), and any
regulations issued pursuant to the WIOA.
2. The board shall submit an annual report of its
activities to the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the president pro tem of the senate no
later than January thirty-first of each year.
3. Nothing in sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2570
to 173.2572 shall be construed to require or allow the board
to assume or supersede the statutory authority granted to,
or impose any duties or requirements on, the state
coordinating board for higher education, the governing
boards of the state's public colleges and universities, the
state board of education, or any local educational agencies.
178.550. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Career and Technical Education Student
Protection Act". There is hereby established the "Career
and Technical Education Advisory Council" within the
department of elementary and secondary education.
2. The advisory council shall be composed of sixteen
members who shall be Missouri residents. The director of
the department of economic development, or his or her
designee, shall be a member. The commissioner of education
shall appoint the following members:
(1) A director or administrator of a career and
technical education center;
(2) An individual from the business community with a
background in commerce;
(3) A representative from State Technical College of
Missouri;
(4) Three current or retired career and technical
education teachers who also serve or served as an advisor to

SS SCS SB 890 12
any of the nationally recognized career and technical
education student organizations of:
(a) DECA;
(b) Future Business Leaders of America (FBLA);
(c) FFA;
(d) Family, Career and Community Leaders of America
(FCCLA);
(e) Health Occupations Students of America (HOSA);
(f) SkillsUSA; or
(g) Technology Student Association (TSA);
(5) A representative from a business organization,
association of businesses, or a business coalition;
(6) A representative from a Missouri community college;
(7) A representative from Southeast Missouri State
University or the University of Central Missouri;
(8) An individual participating in an apprenticeship
recognized by the department of labor and industrial
relations or approved by the United States Department of
Labor's Office of Apprenticeship;
(9) A school administrator or school superintendent of
a school that offers career and technical education.
3. Members appointed by the commissioner of education
shall serve a term of five years except for the initial
appointments, which shall be for the following lengths:
(1) One member shall be appointed for a term of one
year;
(2) Two members shall be appointed for a term of two
years;
(3) Two members shall be appointed for a term of three
years;
(4) Three members shall be appointed for a term of
four years;

SS SCS SB 890 13
(5) Three members shall be appointed for a term of
five years.
4. Four members shall be from the general assembly.
The president pro tempore of the senate shall appoint two
members of the senate of whom not more than one shall be of
the same party. The speaker of the house of representatives
shall appoint two members of the house of representatives of
whom not more than one shall be of the same party. The
legislative members shall serve on the advisory council
until such time as they resign, are no longer members of the
general assembly, or are replaced by new appointments.
5. The advisory council shall have three nonvoting ex
officio members:
(1) A director of guidance and counseling services at
the department of elementary and secondary education, or a
similar position if such position ceases to exist;
(2) The director of the [division] office of workforce
development; and
(3) A member of the coordinating board for higher
education, as selected by the coordinating board.
6. The assistant commissioner for the office of
college and career readiness of the department of elementary
and secondary education shall provide staff assistance to
the advisory council.
7. The advisory council shall meet at least four times
annually. The advisory council may make all rules it deems
necessary to enable it to conduct its meetings, elect its
officers, and set the terms and duties of its officers. The
advisory council shall elect from among its members a
chairperson, vice chairperson, a secretary-reporter, and
such other officers as it deems necessary. Members of the
advisory council shall serve without compensation but may be

SS SCS SB 890 14
reimbursed for actual expenses necessary to the performance
of their official duties for the advisory council.
8. Any business to come before the advisory council
shall be available on the advisory council's internet
website at least seven business days prior to the start of
each meeting. All records of any decisions, votes,
exhibits, or outcomes shall be available on the advisory
council's internet website within forty-eight hours
following the conclusion of every meeting. Any materials
prepared for the members shall be delivered to the members
at least five days before the meeting, and to the extent
such materials are public records as defined in section
610.010 and are not permitted to be closed under section
610.021, shall be made available on the advisory council's
internet website at least five business days in advance of
the meeting.
9. The advisory council shall make an annual written
100 report to the state board of education and the commissioner
101 of education regarding the development, implementation, and
102 administration of the state budget for career and technical
103 education.
104 10. The advisory council shall annually submit written
105 recommendations to the state board of education and the
106 commissioner of education regarding the oversight and
107 procedures for the handling of funds for student career and
108 technical education organizations.
109 11. The advisory council shall:
110 (1) Develop a comprehensive statewide short- and long-
111 range strategic plan for career and technical education;
112 (2) Identify service gaps and provide advice on
113 methods to close such gaps as they relate to youth and adult

SS SCS SB 890 15
114 employees, workforce development, and employers on training
115 needs;
116 (3) Confer with public and private entities for the
117 purpose of promoting and improving career and technical
118 education;
119 (4) Identify legislative recommendations to improve
120 career and technical education;
121 (5) Promote coordination of existing career and
122 technical education programs;
123 (6) Adopt, alter, or repeal by its own bylaws, rules
124 and regulations governing the manner in which its business
125 may be transacted.
126 12. For purposes of this section, the department of
127 elementary and secondary education shall provide such
128 documentation and information as to allow the advisory
129 council to be effective.
130 13. For purposes of this section, "advisory council"
131 shall mean the career and technical education advisory
132 council.
178.585. 1. Under rules and regulations of the state
board of education, the commissioner of education, in
cooperation with the [director of the division] office of
workforce development of the department of [economic] higher
education and workforce development, shall establish
procedures to provide grants to public high schools,
vocational-technical schools, State Technical College of
Missouri, and community colleges solely for the purpose of
new programs, curriculum enhancement, equipment and
facilities so as to upgrade vocational and technical
education in the state.
2. Each vocational-technical school, community
college, State Technical College of Missouri, and school

SS SCS SB 890 16
district of any public high school receiving a grant
authorized by this section shall have an advisory committee
composed of local business persons, labor leaders, parents,
senior citizens, community leaders and teachers to establish
a plan to ensure that students who graduate from the
vocational-technical school, community college, State
Technical College of Missouri, or public high school proceed
to a four-year college or high-wage job with workplace-skill
development opportunities.
3. The [director of the] department of [economic]
higher education and workforce development shall provide
annually to the commissioner of education a listing of
demand occupations in the state including substate
projections. The listing shall include those occupations
for which, in the judgment of the [director of the]
department of [economic] higher education and workforce
development, there is a critical shortage to meet present or
future employment needs necessary to the economic growth and
competitiveness of the state.
4. In any fiscal year, at least seventy-five percent
of all moneys for the grant awards authorized by this
section shall be to public high schools, vocational-
technical schools, State Technical College of Missouri, or
community colleges for new programs, curriculum enhancement
or equipment necessary to address demand occupations
identified pursuant to subsection 3 of this section.
186.019. 1. Prior to April first of each year,
starting in 1992, the information described in subdivisions
(1), (2), (3) and (4) of this subsection shall be delivered
in report form to the Missouri women's council, the
governor's office, the secretary of the senate, and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives. The

SS SCS SB 890 17
information shall apply only to activities which occurred
during the previous calendar year. Reports shall be
required from the following:
(1) The department of labor and industrial relations,
and the [division] office of workforce development of the
department of [economic] higher education and workforce
development, who shall assemble all available data and
report on all business start-ups and business failures which
are fifty-one percent or more owned by women. The reports
shall distinguish, as best as possible, those businesses
which are sole proprietorships, partnerships, or
corporations;
(2) The department of economic development, who shall
assemble all available data and report on financial
assistance or other incentives given to all businesses which
are fifty-one percent or more owned by women. The report
shall contain information relating to assistance or
incentives awarded for the retention of existing businesses,
the expansion of existing businesses, or the start-up of new
businesses;
(3) The department of revenue, who shall assemble all
available data and report on the number, gross receipts and
net income of all businesses which are fifty-one percent or
more owned by women. The reports shall distinguish those
businesses which are sole proprietorships, partnerships or
corporations;
(4) The division of purchasing of the office of
administration, who shall assemble all available data and
report on businesses which are fifty-one percent or more
owned by women which are recipients of contracts awarded by
the state of Missouri.

SS SCS SB 890 18
2. Prior to December first of each year, starting in
1990, the information described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this subsection shall be delivered in report form to the
Missouri women's council, the governor's office, the
secretary of the senate, and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives. The information shall apply only to
activities which occurred during the previous school year.
Reports shall be required from the following:
(1) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall assemble all available data from the
Vocational and Education Data System (VEDS) on class
enrollments by Instruction Program Codes (CIP); by secondary
and postsecondary schools; and, secondary, postsecondary,
and adult level classes; and by gender. This data shall
also be reported by classes of traditional and
nontraditional occupational areas;
(2) The coordinating board for higher education shall
assemble all available data and report on higher education
degrees awarded by academic discipline; type of degree; type
of school; and gender. All available data shall also be
reported on salaries received upon completion of degree
program and subsequent hire, as well as any data available
on follow-up salaries.
192.131. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) ["Advisory panel", the infection control advisory
panel created by section 197.165;
(2)] "Antibiogram", a record of the resistance of
microbes to various antibiotics;
[(3)] (2) "Antimicrobial", the ability of an agent to
destroy or prevent the development of pathogenic action of a
microorganism;

SS SCS SB 890 19
[(4)] (3) "Department", the department of health and
senior services.
2. Every laboratory performing culture and sensitivity
testing on humans in Missouri shall submit data on health
care associated infections to the department in accordance
with this section. The data to be reported shall be defined
by regulation of the department [after considering the
recommendations of the advisory panel]. Such data may
include antibiograms and, not later than July 1, 2005, shall
include but not be limited to the number of patients or
isolates by hospital, ambulatory surgical center, and other
facility or practice setting with methicillin-resistant
staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) or vancomycin-resistant
enterococcus (VRE).
3. Information on infections collected pursuant to
this section shall be subject to the confidentiality
protections of this chapter but shall be available in
provider-specific form to appropriate facility and
professional licensure authorities.
4. The [advisory panel] department shall [develop a
recommended plan to] use laboratory and health care provider
data provided pursuant to this chapter to create a system to:
(1) Enhance the ability of health care providers and
the department to track the incidence and distribution of
preventable infections, with emphasis on those infections
that are most susceptible to interventions and that pose the
greatest risk of harm to Missouri residents;
(2) Monitor trends in the development of antibiotic-
resistant microbes, including but not limited to methicillin-
resistant staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) and vancomycin-
resistant enterococcus (VRE) infections.

SS SCS SB 890 20
5. In implementing this section, [the advisory panel
and] the department shall conform to guidelines and
standards adopted by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention. [The advisory panel's plan may provide for
demonstration projects to assess the viability of the
recommended initiatives.]
192.667. 1. All health care providers shall at least
annually provide to the department charge data as required
by the department. All hospitals shall at least annually
provide patient abstract data and financial data as required
by the department. Hospitals as defined in section 197.020
shall report patient abstract data for outpatients and
inpatients. Ambulatory surgical centers and abortion
facilities as defined in section 197.200 shall provide
patient abstract data to the department. The department
shall specify by rule the types of information which shall
be submitted and the method of submission.
2. The department shall collect data on the incidence
of health care-associated infections from hospitals,
ambulatory surgical centers, abortion facilities, and other
facilities as necessary to generate the reports required by
this section. Hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers,
abortion facilities, and other facilities shall provide such
data in compliance with this section. In order to
streamline government and to eliminate duplicative reporting
requirements, if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, or its successor entity, requires hospitals to
submit health care-associated infection data, then hospitals
and the department shall not be required to comply with the
health care-associated infection data reporting requirements
of subsections 2 to 17 of this section applicable to
hospitals, except that the department shall post a link on

SS SCS SB 890 21
its website to publicly reported data by hospitals on the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' Hospital Compare
website, or its successor.
3. The department shall promulgate rules specifying
the standards and procedures for the collection, analysis,
risk adjustment, and reporting of the incidence of health
care-associated infections and the types of infections and
procedures to be monitored pursuant to subsection 13 of this
section. In promulgating such rules, the department shall[:
(1)] use methodologies and systems for data collection
established by the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention's National Healthcare Safety Network, or its
successor[; and
(2) Consider the findings and recommendations of the
infection control advisory panel established pursuant to
section 197.165].
4. [By January 1, 2017, the infection control advisory
panel created by section 197.165 shall make recommendations
to] The department [regarding] shall continue to assess the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' health care-
associated infection data collection, analysis, and public
reporting requirements for hospitals, ambulatory surgical
centers, and other facilities in the federal Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention's National Healthcare Safety
Network, or its successor, in lieu of all or part of the
data collection, analysis, and public reporting requirements
of this section. The [advisory panel recommendations]
department shall address which hospitals shall be required
as a condition of licensure to use the National Healthcare
Safety Network for data collection; the use of the National
Healthcare Safety Network for risk adjustment and analysis
of hospital submitted data; and the use of the Centers for

SS SCS SB 890 22
Medicare and Medicaid Services' Hospital Compare website, or
its successor, for public reporting of the incidence of
health care-associated infection metrics. [The advisory
panel shall consider the following factors in developing its
recommendation:
(1) Whether the public is afforded the same or greater
access to facility-specific infection control indicators and
metrics;
(2) Whether the data provided to the public is subject
to the same or greater accuracy of risk adjustment;
(3) Whether the public is provided with the same or
greater specificity of reporting of infections by type of
facility infections and procedures;
(4) Whether the data is subject to the same or greater
level of confidentiality of the identity of an individual
patient;
(5) Whether the National Healthcare Safety Network, or
its successor, has the capacity to receive, analyze, and
report the required data for all facilities;
(6) Whether the cost to implement the National
Healthcare Safety Network infection data collection and
reporting system is the same or less.]
5. [After considering the recommendations of the
infection control advisory panel, and provided that the
requirements of subsection 13 of this section can be met,]
The department shall implement guidelines from the federal
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's National
Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor. It shall be a
condition of licensure for hospitals that meet the minimum
public reporting requirements of the National Healthcare
Safety Network and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to participate in the National Healthcare Safety

SS SCS SB 890 23
Network, or its successor. Such hospitals shall permit the
National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor, to
disclose facility-specific infection data to the department
as required under this section, and as necessary to provide
the public reports required by the department. It shall be
a condition of licensure for any ambulatory surgical center
or abortion facility which does not voluntarily participate
in the National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor,
to submit facility-specific data to the department as
100 required under this section, and as necessary to provide the
101 public reports required by the department.
102 6. The department shall not require the resubmission
103 of data which has been submitted to the department of health
104 and senior services or the department of social services
105 under any other provision of law. The department of health
106 and senior services shall accept data submitted by
107 associations or related organizations on behalf of health
108 care providers by entering into binding agreements
109 negotiated with such associations or related organizations
110 to obtain data required pursuant to section 192.665 and this
111 section. A health care provider shall submit the required
112 information to the department of health and senior services:
113 (1) If the provider does not submit the required data
114 through such associations or related organizations;
115 (2) If no binding agreement has been reached within
116 ninety days of August 28, 1992, between the department of
117 health and senior services and such associations or related
118 organizations; or
119 (3) If a binding agreement has expired for more than
120 ninety days.
121 7. Information obtained by the department under the
122 provisions of section 192.665 and this section shall not be

SS SCS SB 890 24
123 public information. Reports and studies prepared by the
124 department based upon such information shall be public
125 information and may identify individual health care
126 providers. The department of health and senior services may
127 authorize the use of the data by other research
128 organizations pursuant to the provisions of section
129 192.067. The department shall not use or release any
130 information provided under section 192.665 and this section
131 which would enable any person to determine any health care
132 provider's negotiated discounts with specific preferred
133 provider organizations or other managed care organizations.
134 The department shall not release data in a form which could
135 be used to identify a patient. Any violation of this
136 subsection is a class A misdemeanor.
137 8. The department shall undertake a reasonable number
138 of studies and publish information, including at least an
139 annual consumer guide, in collaboration with health care
140 providers, business coalitions and consumers based upon the
141 information obtained pursuant to the provisions of section
142 192.665 and this section. The department shall allow all
143 health care providers and associations and related
144 organizations who have submitted data which will be used in
145 any publication to review and comment on the publication
146 prior to its publication or release for general use. The
147 publication shall be made available to the public for a
148 reasonable charge.
149 9. Any health care provider which continually and
150 substantially, as these terms are defined by rule, fails to
151 comply with the provisions of this section shall not be
152 allowed to participate in any program administered by the
153 state or to receive any moneys from the state.

SS SCS SB 890 25
154 10. A hospital, as defined in section 197.020,
155 aggrieved by the department's determination of ineligibility
156 for state moneys pursuant to subsection 9 of this section
157 may appeal as provided in section 197.071. An ambulatory
158 surgical center or abortion facility as defined in section
159 197.200 aggrieved by the department's determination of
160 ineligibility for state moneys pursuant to subsection 9 of
161 this section may appeal as provided in section 197.221.
162 11. The department of health may promulgate rules
163 providing for collection of data and publication of the
164 incidence of health care-associated infections for other
165 types of health facilities determined to be sources of
166 infections; except that, physicians' offices shall be exempt
167 from reporting and disclosure of such infections.
168 12. [By January 1, 2017, the advisory panel shall
169 recommend and] The department shall adopt in regulation
170 [with an effective date of no later than January 1, 2018,]
171 the requirements for the reporting of the following types of
172 infections as specified in this subsection:
173 (1) Infections associated with a minimum of four
174 surgical procedures for hospitals and a minimum of two
175 surgical procedures for ambulatory surgical centers that
176 meet the following criteria:
177 (a) Are usually associated with an elective surgical
178 procedure. An "elective surgical procedure" is a planned,
179 nonemergency surgical procedure that may be either medically
180 required such as a hip replacement or optional such as
181 breast augmentation;
182 (b) Demonstrate a high priority aspect such as
183 affecting a large number of patients, having a substantial
184 impact for a smaller population, or being associated with
185 substantial cost, morbidity, or mortality; or

SS SCS SB 890 26
186 (c) Are infections for which reports are collected by
187 the National Healthcare Safety Network or its successor;
188 (2) Central line-related bloodstream infections;
189 (3) Health care-associated infections specified for
190 reporting by hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, and
191 other health care facilities by the rules of the Centers for
192 Medicare and Medicaid Services to the federal Centers for
193 Disease Control and Prevention's National Healthcare Safety
194 Network, or its successor; and
195 (4) Other categories of infections that may be
196 established by rule by the department.
197 The department[, in consultation with the advisory panel,]
198 shall be authorized to collect and report data on subsets of
199 each type of infection described in this subsection.
200 13. [In consultation with the infection control
201 advisory panel established pursuant to section 197.165,] The
202 department shall develop and disseminate to the public
203 reports based on data compiled for a period of twelve
204 months. Such reports shall be updated [quarterly] at least
205 annually and shall show for each hospital, ambulatory
206 surgical center, abortion facility, and other facility
207 metrics on risk-adjusted health care-associated infections
208 under this section.
209 14. The types of infections under subsection 12 of
210 this section to be publicly reported shall be determined by
211 the department by rule and shall be consistent with the
212 infections tracked by the National Healthcare Safety
213 Network, or its successor.
214 15. Reports published pursuant to subsection 13 of
215 this section shall be published and readily accessible on
216 the department's internet website. The reports shall be

SS SCS SB 890 27
217 distributed at least annually to the governor and members of
218 the general assembly. The department shall make such
219 reports available to the public for a period of at least two
220 years.
221 16. The Hospital Industry Data Institute shall publish
222 a report of Missouri hospitals', ambulatory surgical
223 centers', and abortion facilities' compliance with
224 standardized quality of care measures established by the
225 federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for
226 prevention of infections related to surgical procedures. If
227 the Hospital Industry Data Institute fails to do so by July
228 31, 2008, and annually thereafter, the department shall be
229 authorized to collect information from the Centers for
230 Medicare and Medicaid Services or from hospitals, ambulatory
231 surgical centers, and abortion facilities and publish such
232 information in accordance with this section.
233 17. The data collected or published pursuant to this
234 section shall be available to the department for purposes of
235 licensing hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, and
236 abortion facilities pursuant to chapter 197.
237 18. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
238 the provisions of section 192.131 and sections 197.150 to
239 197.160. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
240 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
241 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
242 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
243 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
244 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
245 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
246 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
247 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
248 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking

SS SCS SB 890 28
249 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
250 2004, shall be invalid and void.
251 19. [No later than August 28, 2017,] Each hospital,
252 excluding mental health facilities as defined in section
253 632.005, and each ambulatory surgical center and abortion
254 facility as defined in section 197.200, shall in
255 consultation with its medical staff establish an
256 antimicrobial stewardship program for evaluating the
257 judicious use of antimicrobials, especially antibiotics that
258 are the last line of defense against resistant infections.
259 The hospital's stewardship program and the results of the
260 program shall be monitored and evaluated by hospital quality
261 improvement departments and shall be available upon
262 inspection to the department. At a minimum, the
263 antimicrobial stewardship program shall be designed to
264 evaluate that hospitalized patients receive, in accordance
265 with accepted medical standards of practice, the appropriate
266 antimicrobial, at the appropriate dose, at the appropriate
267 time, and for the appropriate duration.
268 20. Hospitals described in subsection 19 of this
269 section shall meet the National Healthcare Safety Network
270 requirements for reporting antimicrobial usage or resistance
271 by using the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's
272 Antimicrobial Use and Resistance (AUR) Module when
273 conditions of participation promulgated by the Centers for
274 Medicare and Medicaid Services requiring the electronic
275 reporting of antibiotic use or antibiotic resistance by
276 hospitals become effective. When such antimicrobial usage
277 or resistance reporting takes effect, hospitals shall
278 authorize the National Healthcare Safety Network, or its
279 successor, to disclose to the department facility-specific
280 information reported to the AUR Module. Facility-specific

SS SCS SB 890 29
281 data on antibiotic usage and resistance collected under this
282 subsection shall not be disclosed to the public, but the
283 department may release case-specific information to other
284 facilities, physicians, and the public if the department
285 determines on a case-by-case basis that the release of such
286 information is necessary to protect persons in a public
287 health emergency. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a
288 hospital from voluntarily reporting antibiotic use or
289 antibiotic resistance data through the National Healthcare
290 Safety Network, or its successor, prior to the effective
291 date of the conditions of participation requiring the
292 reporting.
293 21. The department shall make a report to the general
294 assembly beginning January 1, 2018, and on every January
295 first thereafter on the incidence, type, and distribution of
296 antimicrobial-resistant infections identified in the state
297 and within regions of the state.
192.700. There is hereby established a state arthritis
program. [The board and the committee established by
sections 192.700 to 192.727 are to administer state, federal
and private grants and programs dealing with arthritis and
related diseases as a part of this arthritis program.]
Regional arthritis [centers] programs established pursuant
to sections 192.700 to 192.727 constitute part of the state
arthritis program.
192.703. As used in sections 192.700 to 192.727, the
[following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the Missouri arthritis advisory board;
(2) "Committee", the arthritis program review
committee;
(3)] term "director"[,] means the director of the
department of health and senior services.

SS SCS SB 890 30
192.714. 1. Beginning October 1, [1984] 2026, there
shall be established within this state, and within the
department of health and senior services, [a network of]
regional arthritis [centers] programs, subject to
appropriations, designed to [demonstrate and stimulate the
prompt and effective application of available knowledge for
the treatment of patients with arthritis and related
musculoskeletal diseases, and to develop new knowledge
essential for the control of these disorders] improve
knowledge and access to arthritis management among adults
with arthritis.
2. The arthritis [centers] programs established
pursuant to sections 192.700 to 192.727 shall operate
programs in the area of education of patients, their
families, and the public.
[3. At least one regional arthritis center shall be
established in each of the following seven regions, the
boundaries of which shall be determined by the board:
(1) Greater St. Louis area;
(2) Southeast;
(3) Northeast;
(4) Central;
(5) Southwest;
(6) Northwest; and
(7) Greater Kansas City area.]
196.1106. Centers for life sciences research shall be
established and shall be subject to the following provisions:
(1) A "center for excellence for life sciences
research" means a system or regional consortium of public
and private not-for-profit academic, research, or health
care institutions or organizations engaged in competitive
research in targeted fields consistent with the strategic

SS SCS SB 890 31
purposes of life sciences research as provided in sections
196.1100 to 196.1130;
(2) The [life sciences research board] department of
economic development shall monitor and adopt such rules as
are necessary to assure quality and accountability in the
operation of the centers for excellence for life sciences
research;
(3) One St. Louis area center for excellence may be
established within the geographical area encompassing the
city of St. Louis and St. Louis, St. Charles, Jefferson, and
Franklin counties. If any part of a municipality is located
within any one such county and also encompasses a part of
another county in this state, the entire area encompassed
within the city limits of such municipality shall be a part
of the geographical area of the St. Louis area center for
excellence;
(4) One Kansas City area center for excellence may be
established within the geographical area encompassing
Jackson, Clay, Andrew, Buchanan, and Platte counties. If
any part of a municipality is located within any one such
county and also encompasses a part of another county in this
state, the entire area encompassed within the city limits of
such municipality shall be a part of the geographical area
of the Kansas City area center for excellence;
(5) One Springfield center for excellence may be
established within the geographical area encompassing
Greene, Christian, and Webster counties;
(6) A Missouri statewide center for excellence may be
established that shall encompass the institutions,
agricultural research centers dedicated to the development
of plant-made pharmaceuticals, and campuses within the
University of Missouri system and those regions of Missouri

SS SCS SB 890 32
not encompassed within another center for excellence;
provided that the University of Missouri-Kansas City and the
University of Missouri-St. Louis shall participate in the
centers for excellence in their respective geographical
regions;
(7) The [life sciences research board] department of
economic development shall receive and review suggestions
for the formation and composition of the initial centers for
excellence. After receiving and reviewing such suggestions,
the [life sciences research board] department shall
determine the initial composition, and shall consider and
approve the organizational plan and structure of the St.
Louis area, Kansas City area, Springfield area, and Missouri
statewide centers for excellence;
(8) Before any center for excellence is considered to
be a center for excellence for life sciences research under
sections 196.1100 to 196.1130, its composition and
organizational structure shall be approved by the [life
sciences research board] department;
(9) Any center for excellence for life sciences
research that is established within a geographical area
specified in sections 196.1100 to 196.1130 shall be
comprised of a consortium of public and private not-for-
profit academic, research, or health care institutions or
organizations that have collectively at least fifteen
million dollars in annual research expenditures in the life
sciences, including a collective minimum of two million
dollars in basic research in life sciences;
(10) Each center for excellence for life sciences
research shall appoint a screening committee. The centers,
through their screening committees, shall solicit, collect,
prioritize, and forward to the [life sciences research

SS SCS SB 890 33
board] department proposed research initiatives for
consideration for funding by the [board] department.
Members of each screening committee shall generally be
familiar with the life sciences and current trends and
developments with either technical or scientific expertise
in the life sciences with an understanding of life sciences
and with an understanding of the application of the results
of life sciences research. No member of a screening
committee shall be employed by any public or private entity
eligible to receive financial support from the life sciences
research trust fund; and
(11) The centers for excellence for life sciences
research shall have any and all powers attendant to carrying
out the operations that are not contrary to the provisions
of sections 196.1100 to 196.1130 or any rules, guidelines,
or decisions adopted by the [life sciences research board]
department.
[196.1109. All moneys that are
appropriated by the general assembly from the
life sciences research trust fund shall be
appropriated to the life sciences research board
to increase the capacity for quality of life
sciences research at public and private not-for-
profit institutions in the state of Missouri and
to thereby:
(1) Improve the quantity and quality of
life sciences research at public and private not-
for-profit institutions, including but not
limited to basic research (including the
discovery of new knowledge), translational
research (including translating knowledge into a
usable form), and clinical research (including
the literal application of a therapy or
intervention to determine its efficacy),
including but not limited to health research in
human development and aging, cancer, endocrine,
cardiovascular, neurological, pulmonary, and

SS SCS SB 890 34
infectious disease, and plant sciences,
including but not limited to nutrition and food
safety; and
(2) Enhance technology transfer and
technology commercialization derived from
research at public and private not-for-profit
institutions within the centers for excellence.
For purposes of sections 196.1100 to 196.1130,
"technology transfer and technology
commercialization" includes stages of the
regular business cycle occurring after research
and development of a life science technology,
including but not limited to reduction to
practice, proof of concept, and achieving
federal Food and Drug Administration, United
States Department of Agriculture, or other
regulatory requirements in addition to the
definition in section 348.251.
Funds received by the board may be used for
purposes authorized in sections 196.1100 to
196.1130 and shall be subject to the
restrictions of sections 196.1100 to 196.1130,
including but not limited to the costs of
personnel, supplies, equipment, and renovation
or construction of physical facilities; provided
that in any single fiscal year no more than
thirty percent of the moneys appropriated shall
be used for the construction of physical
facilities and further provided that in any
fiscal year up to eighty percent of the moneys
shall be appropriated to build research capacity
at public and private not-for-profit
institutions and at least twenty percent and no
more than fifty percent of the moneys shall be
appropriated for grants to public or private not-
for-profit institutions to promote life science
technology transfer and technology
commercialization. Of the moneys appropriated
to build research capacity, twenty percent of
the moneys shall be appropriated to promote the
development of research of tobacco-related
illnesses.]

SS SCS SB 890 35
196.1109. All moneys that are appropriated by the
general assembly from the life sciences research trust fund
shall be appropriated to the [life sciences research board]
department of economic development to increase the capacity
for quality of life sciences research at public and private
not-for-profit institutions in the state of Missouri and to
thereby:
(1) Improve the quantity and quality of life sciences
research at public and private not-for-profit institutions,
including but not limited to basic research (including the
discovery of new knowledge), translational research
(including translating knowledge into a usable form), and
clinical research (including the literal application of a
therapy or intervention to determine its efficacy),
including but not limited to health research in human
development and aging, cancer, endocrine, cardiovascular,
neurological, pulmonary, and infectious disease, and plant
sciences, including but not limited to nutrition and food
safety; and
(2) Enhance technology transfer and technology
commercialization derived from research at public and
private not-for-profit institutions within the centers for
excellence. For purposes of sections 196.1100 to 196.1130,
"technology transfer and technology commercialization"
includes stages of the regular business cycle occurring
after research and development of a life science technology,
including but not limited to reduction to practice, proof of
concept, and achieving federal Food and Drug Administration,
United States Department of Agriculture, or other regulatory
requirements in addition to the definition in section
348.251.

SS SCS SB 890 36
Funds received by the [board] department may be used for
purposes authorized in sections 196.1100 to 196.1130 and
shall be subject to the restrictions of sections 196.1100 to
196.1130, including but not limited to the costs of
personnel, supplies, equipment, and renovation or
construction of physical facilities; provided that in any
single fiscal year no more than ten percent of the moneys
appropriated shall be used for the construction of physical
facilities and further provided that in any fiscal year
eighty percent of the moneys shall be appropriated to build
research capacity at public and private not-for-profit
institutions and twenty percent of the moneys shall be
appropriated for grants to public or private not-for-profit
institutions to promote life science technology transfer and
technology commercialization. Of the moneys appropriated to
build research capacity, twenty percent of the moneys shall
be appropriated to promote the development of research of
tobacco-related illnesses.
196.1112. In determining projects to authorize, the
[life sciences research board] department of economic
development shall consider those proposals endorsed by a
center for excellence, subject to a process of peer review
conducted under the auspices of the [board] department, and
shall also consider the potential of any proposal to bring
both health and economic benefits to the people of
Missouri. Specifically, at least eighty percent of the
moneys that are appropriated to the [board] department in
each fiscal year shall be distributed to public and private
not-for-profit institutions or organizations whose programs
and proposals have been recommended by a center for
excellence that meets the requirements set forth in
subdivisions (8) and (9) of section 196.1106. Collectively,

SS SCS SB 890 37
the institutions or organizations within a single center for
excellence shall receive in a single fiscal year no more
than fifty percent of the moneys appropriated to the [board]
department during such fiscal year. No single institution
or organization shall receive in any consecutive three-
fiscal-year period more than forty percent of the moneys
appropriated to the [board] department during such three-
fiscal-year period.
[196.1115. 1. The moneys appropriated to
the life sciences research board that are not
distributed by the board in any fiscal year to a
center for excellence or a center for excellence
endorsed program pursuant to section 196.1112,
if any, shall be held in reserve by the board or
shall be awarded on the basis of peer review
panel recommendations for capacity building
initiatives proposed by public and private not-
for-profit academic, research, or health care
institutions or organizations, or individuals
engaged in competitive research in targeted
fields consistent with the provisions of
sections 196.1100 to 196.1130.
2. The life sciences research board may,
in view of the limitations expressed in section
196.1130:
(1) Award and enter into grants or
contracts relating to increasing Missouri's
research capacity at public or private not-for-
profit institutions;
(2) Make provision for peer review panels
to recommend and review research projects;
(3) Contract for support services;
(4) Lease or acquire facilities and
equipment;
(5) Employ administrative staff; and
(6) Receive, retain, hold, invest,
disburse or administer any moneys that it
receives from appropriations or from any other
source.
3. The Missouri technology corporation,
established under section 348.251, shall serve

SS SCS SB 890 38
as the administrative agent for the life
sciences research board.
4. The life sciences research board shall
utilize as much of the moneys as reasonably
possible for building capacity at public and
private not-for-profit institutions to do
research rather than for administrative
expenses. The board shall not in any fiscal
year expend more than two percent of the total
moneys appropriated to it and of the moneys that
it has in reserve or has received from other
sources for its own administrative expenses for
appropriations equal to or greater than twenty
million dollars; three percent for
appropriations less than twenty million dollars
but equal to or greater than fifteen million
dollars; four percent for appropriations less
than fifteen million dollars but equal to or
greater than ten million dollars; five percent
for appropriations less than ten million
dollars; provided, however, that the general
assembly by appropriation from the life sciences
research trust fund may authorize a limited
amount of additional moneys to be expended for
administrative costs.]
196.1115. 1. The moneys appropriated to the [life
sciences research board] department of economic development
that are not distributed by the [board] department in any
fiscal year to a center for excellence or a center for
excellence endorsed program pursuant to section 196.1112, if
any, shall be held in reserve by the [board] department or
shall be awarded on the basis of peer review panel
recommendations for capacity building initiatives proposed
by public and private not-for-profit academic, research, or
health care institutions or organizations, or individuals
engaged in competitive research in targeted fields
consistent with the provisions of sections 196.1100 to
196.1130.

SS SCS SB 890 39
2. The [life sciences research board] department may,
in view of the limitations expressed in section 196.1130:
(1) Award and enter into grants or contracts relating
to increasing Missouri's research capacity at public or
private not-for-profit institutions;
(2) Make provision for peer review panels to recommend
and review research projects;
(3) Contract for administrative and support services;
(4) Lease or acquire facilities and equipment;
(5) Employ administrative staff; and
(6) Receive, retain, hold, invest, disburse or
administer any moneys that it receives from appropriations
or from any other source.
3. The [life sciences research board] department shall
utilize as much of the moneys as reasonably possible for
building capacity at public and private not-for-profit
institutions to do research rather than for administrative
expenses. The [board] department shall not in any fiscal
year expend more than two percent of the total moneys
appropriated to it and of the moneys that it has in reserve
or has received from other sources for its own
administrative expenses; provided, however, that the general
assembly by appropriation from the life sciences research
trust fund may authorize a limited amount of additional
moneys to be expended for administrative costs.
196.1118. The [life sciences research board]
department of economic development shall make provision for
and secure the state auditor or outside public accounting
firm an annual audit of its financial affairs and the moneys
expended from the life sciences research trust fund. Such
audit shall be performed on a fiscal year basis and the cost
of such audit shall not be considered as an administrative

SS SCS SB 890 40
expense for purposes of subsection 3 of section 196.1115.
The [board] department shall make copies of each audit
available to the public. Every three years the [board]
department, with the assistance of its staff or independent
contractors as determined by the [board] department, shall
prepare a comprehensive report assessing the work and
progress of the life sciences research program. Such
assessment report shall analyze the impact of the [board's]
department's programs, grants, and contracts performed,
shall be provided to the governor and the general assembly,
and shall be available to the public. The cost of such
assessment report shall not be considered an administrative
expense for purposes of subsection 3 of section 196.1115.
196.1121. 1. Grant or contract awards made with
moneys appropriated from the life sciences research trust
fund shall provide for the reimbursement of costs. Whether
reimbursement of specific costs is allowed depends on the
application of a four-part test balancing which shall
include:
(1) The reasonableness of the cost;
(2) The connection to the grant or contract;
(3) The consistency demonstrated in assigning costs to
the grant or contract; and
(4) Conformance with the specific terms and conditions
of the award or contract.
The [life sciences research board] department of economic
development may from time to time issue rules and guidelines
consistent with such four-part test and provide grant and
contract recipients with a list or other explanation of
regularly permitted costs.

SS SCS SB 890 41
2. Grant and contract recipients shall preserve
research freedom, ensure timely disclosure of their research
findings to the scientific community, including through
publications and presentations at scientific meetings, and
promote utilization, commercialization, and public
availability of their inventions and other intellectual
property developed as a general institutional policy.
Institutions or organizations receiving grant or contract
awards shall retain all right, title, and interest,
including all intellectual property rights, in and to any
and all inventions, ideas, data, improvements,
modifications, know-how, creations, copyrightable material,
trade secrets, methods, processes, discoveries, and
derivatives, regardless of patentability, that are made in
the performance of work under a grant award. The [life
sciences research board] department shall adopt reasonable
rules to ensure that any such intellectual property rights
are utilized reasonably and in a manner that is in the
public interest.
196.1127. 1. The moneys appropriated to the [life
sciences research board] department of economic development
pursuant to sections 196.1100 to 196.1124 shall be subject
to the provisions of this section.
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Abortion services" include performing, inducing,
or assisting with abortions, as defined in section 188.015,
or encouraging patients to have abortions, referring
patients for abortions not necessary to save the life of the
mother, or development of drugs, chemicals, or devices
intended to be used to induce an abortion;

SS SCS SB 890 42
(2) "Child", a human being recognized as a minor
pursuant to the laws of this state, including if in vivo, an
unborn child as defined in section 188.015 and if in vitro,
a human being at any of the stages of biological development
of an unborn child from conception or inception onward;
(3) "Conception", the same meaning as such term is
defined in section 188.015;
(4) "Facilities and administrative costs", those costs
that are incurred for common or joint objectives and
therefore cannot be identified readily and specifically with
a particular research project or any other institutional
activity;
(5) "Human cloning", the creation of a human being by
any means other than by the fertilization of an oocyte of a
human female by a sperm of a human male;
(6) "Prohibited human research", research in a
research project in which there is the taking or utilization
of the organs, tissues, or cellular material of:
(a) A deceased child, unless consent is given by the
parents in a manner provided in sections 194.210 to 194.290
relating to anatomical gifts, and neither parent caused the
death of such child or consented to another person causing
the death of such child;
(b) A living child, when the intended or likely result
of such taking or utilization is to kill or cause harm to
the health, safety, or welfare of such child, or when the
purpose is to target such child for possible destruction in
the future;
(7) "Public funds", include:
(a) Any moneys received or controlled by the state of
Missouri or any official, department, division, agency, or
political subdivision thereof, including but not limited to

SS SCS SB 890 43
moneys derived from federal, state, or local taxes, gifts,
or grants from any source, settlements of any claims or
causes of action, public or private, bond proceeds, federal
grants or payments, or intergovernmental transfers;
(b) Any moneys received or controlled by an official,
department, division, or agency of state government or any
political subdivision thereof, or to any person or entity
pursuant to appropriation by the general assembly or
governing body of any political subdivision of this state;
(8) "Research project", research proposed to be funded
by an award of public funds conducted under the auspices of
the entity or entities that applied for and received such
award, regardless of whether the research is funded in whole
or in part by such award. Such research shall include basic
research, including the discovery of new knowledge;
translational research, including translational knowledge in
a usable form; and clinical research, including but not
limited to health research in human development and aging,
cancer, endocrine, cardiovascular, neurological, pulmonary,
and infectious disease.
3. Public funds shall not be expended, paid, or
granted to or on behalf of an existing or proposed research
project that involves abortion services, human cloning, or
prohibited human research. A research project that receives
an award of public funds shall not share costs with another
research project, person, or entity not eligible to receive
public funds pursuant to this subsection; provided that a
research project that receives an award of public funds may
pay a pro rata share of facilities and administrative costs
determined in the award of public funds according to
standards that ensure that public funds do not in any way
subsidize facilities and administrative costs of other

SS SCS SB 890 44
research projects, persons, or entities not eligible to
receive public funds pursuant to this subsection. The
application for an award of public funds shall set forth the
proposed rates of pro rata cost reimbursement and shall
provide supporting data and rationale for such rates. All
applicants for and recipients of awards of public funds
shall comply with the cost accounting principles set forth
in Part 9905 of Title 48 of the Code of Federal Regulations,
or successor regulations, in connection with the application
for and administration of the research project. All moneys
derived from an award of public funds shall be expended only
by checks, drafts, or electronic transfers using a separate
accounting process maintained for each research project. No
moneys derived from an award of public funds shall be used
to cover costs for any other research project or to any
other person or entity. No moneys derived from an award of
public funds shall be passed through to any other research
project, person, or entity unless included in the original
application for the award of public funds or in subsequent
amendments or requests to use separate contractors. A
research project that receives an award of public funds
shall maintain financial records that demonstrate strict
compliance with this subsection. Any audit conducted
100 pursuant to any grant or contract awarding public funds
101 shall also certify whether there is compliance with this
102 subsection and shall note any noncompliance as a material
103 audit finding.
104 4. The provisions of this section shall inure to the
105 benefit of all residents of this state. Any taxpayer of
106 this state or any political subdivision of this state shall
107 have standing to bring suit against the state of Missouri or
108 any official, department, division, agency, or political

SS SCS SB 890 45
109 subdivision of this state, and any recipient of public funds
110 who or which is in violation of this subsection in any
111 circuit court with jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of
112 this section.
113 5. This section shall not be construed to permit or
114 make lawful any conduct that is otherwise unlawful pursuant
115 to the laws of this state.
116 6. Any provision of this section is not severable from
117 any appropriation subject to this section or any application
118 declared by any court to be subject to this section. If any
119 provision of this section is found to be invalid or
120 unconstitutional, any appropriation subject to this section
121 or any appropriation declared by any court to be subject to
122 this section shall be void, invalid, and unenforceable.
209.285. As used in sections 209.285 to 209.339,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
terms mean:
(1) "American sign language", a visual-gestural system
of communication that has its own syntax, rhetoric and
grammar. American sign language is recognized, accepted and
used by many deaf Americans. This native language
represents concepts rather than words;
(2) ["Board", the Missouri board for certification of
interpreters, established within the commission in section
209.287;
(3)] "Certification", a document issued by the
Missouri commission for the deaf and hard of hearing
declaring that the holder is qualified to practice
interpreting at a disclosed level;
[(4)] (3) "Commission", the Missouri commission for
the deaf and hard of hearing;

SS SCS SB 890 46
[(5)] (4) "Committee", the Missouri state committee of
interpreters, established in section 209.319;
[(6)] (5) "Conversion levels", the process of granting
levels of certification by the commission to individuals
holding certification from another state or within another
certification system in this state or another state;
[(7)] (6) "Coordinator", a staff person, hired by the
executive director of the Missouri commission for the deaf
and hard of hearing, who shall serve as coordinator for the
Missouri interpreter certification system;
[(8)] (7) "Deaf person", any person who is not able to
discriminate speech when spoken in a normal conversational
tone regardless of the use of amplification devices;
[(9)] (8) "Department", the department of commerce and
insurance;
[(10)] (9) "Director", the director of the division of
professional registration;
[(11)] (10) "Division", the division of professional
registration;
[(12)] (11) "Executive director", the executive
director of the Missouri commission for the deaf and hard of
hearing;
[(13)] (12) "Interpreter", any person who offers to
render interpreting services implying that he or she is
trained, and experienced in interpreting, and holds a
current, valid certification and license to practice
interpreting in this state; provided that a
telecommunications operator providing deaf relay service or
a person providing operator services for the deaf shall not
be considered to be an interpreter;
[(14)] (13) "Interpreter trainer", a person, certified
and licensed by the state of Missouri as an interpreter, who

SS SCS SB 890 47
trains new interpreters in the translating of spoken English
or written concepts to any necessary specialized vocabulary
used by a deaf consumer. Necessary specialized vocabularies
include, but are not limited to, American sign language,
Pidgin Signed English, oral, tactile sign and language
deficient skills;
[(15)] (14) "Interpreting", the translating of English
spoken or written concepts to any necessary specialized
vocabulary used by a deaf person or the translating of a
deaf person's specialized vocabulary to English spoken or
written concepts; provided that a telecommunications
operator providing deaf relay service or a person providing
operator services for the deaf shall not be considered to be
interpreting. Necessary specialized vocabularies include,
but are not limited to, American sign language, Pidgin
Signed English, oral, tactile sign and language deficient
skills;
[(16)] (15) "Language deficient", mode of
communication used by deaf individuals who lack crucial
language components, including, but not limited to,
vocabulary, language concepts, expressive skills, language
skills and receptive skills;
[(17)] (16) "Missouri commission for the deaf",
Missouri commission for the deaf and hard of hearing
established in section 161.400;
[(18)] (17) "Oral", mode of communication having
characteristics of speech, speech reading and residual
hearing as a primary means of communication using
situational and culturally appropriate gestures, without the
use of sign language;

SS SCS SB 890 48
[(19)] (18) "Pidgin Signed English", a mode of
communication having characteristics of American sign
language;
[(20)] (19) "Practice of interpreting", rendering or
offering to render or supervise those who render to
individuals, couples, groups, organizations, institutions,
corporations, schools, government agencies or the general
public any interpreting service involving the translation of
any mode of communication used by a deaf person to spoken
English or of spoken English to a mode of communication used
by a deaf person;
[(21)] (20) "Tactile sign", mode of communication,
used by deaf and blind individuals, using any one or a
combination of the following: tactile sign, constricted
space sign or notetaking.
209.292. [1.] The [board] commission shall[, with the
approval of the commission]:
(1) Prescribe qualifications for each of the several
levels of certification based on proficiency and shall
evaluate and certify interpreters using such qualifications;
(2) Issue the certificates, bearing the signature of
the executive director, necessary to qualify for a license
to interpret;
(3) Develop a fee scale for interpreting services,
pursuant to section 161.405;
(4) Maintain the quality of interpreting services,
pursuant to section 161.405, by:
(a) Generating ideas for conducting interpreter
training workshops to update knowledge and skills; and
(b) Suggesting institutions of higher education to
provide interpreter training programs;

SS SCS SB 890 49
(5) Develop specific guidelines for the use of
interpreters according to their level of certification and
submit the guidelines to the division and copies to be
distributed to state departments, agencies, commissions,
courts, interpreters and to the public;
(6) Develop ethical rules of conduct to be recommended
for adoption by the division;
(7) Develop fees for application, administration of an
evaluation, conversion and certificate renewal, to cover the
cost of the certification system and administration;
(8) Compile a statewide registry of interpreters by
skill level and include recommendations relating to the
appropriate selection and utilization of interpreters for
the deaf. The registry shall be made available to and
recommended for adoption by state commissions, departments
and agencies;
(9) Develop a conversion system and policy for
accepting other certification systems into the certification
offered by the Missouri commission for the deaf and hard of
hearing;
(10) Develop acceptable professional development
activities to maintain certification;
(11) Investigate and implement the most appropriate
testing model for interpreter certification;
(12) When necessary, develop an evaluation team,
appointed by the commission, to assist in evaluating
interpreters;
(13) Provide opportunity to hear grievances against
the certification process or one of its members using the
guidelines established in chapter 621.
[2. An evaluation team appointed pursuant to
subdivision (12) of subsection 1 of this section shall have

SS SCS SB 890 50
similar backgrounds to the members of the board. The
evaluation team shall serve at the pleasure of the
commission. The commission shall reimburse evaluators for
actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
their official duties and may fairly compensate them. A
member of an evaluation team may be removed from the team by
the executive director, after notice and an opportunity to
be heard, for the following reasons: misconduct,
inefficiency, incompetence or neglect of official duties.]
209.299. The [board] commission shall schedule
evaluations for persons seeking certification, at a central
location, at least four times each year in 1995 and 1996,
and at least twice a year thereafter, according to the
number of applicants seeking certification. As soon as
possible after completion of an evaluation, the coordinator
shall notify the applicant of his score and level of
certification.
209.305. 1. The evaluation shall be an assessment of
interpreter's language skills, expressive and receptive
skills, professionalism, knowledge of interpreting and
ethical practices. Modes of communication that shall be
evaluated include, but are not limited to:
(1) American sign language;
(2) Tactile sign;
(3) Language deficient;
(4) Oral;
(5) Pidgin Signed English; and
(6) Any necessary specialized vocabulary, language or
mode of communication in popular or regional use among deaf
people.
2. The [board or an evaluation team] commission shall
use testing materials developed by the commission or

SS SCS SB 890 51
contracted with a national organization to assess the
qualifications of interpreters. All testing materials and
records shall be held confidential by the commission.
209.307. Any member of [the board or] an evaluation
team who has a conflict of interest that may have a direct
effect on an evaluation shall excuse himself or herself from
the evaluation. The remaining members shall assess that
individual's performance.
209.309. The [board] commission may offer provisional
certification to interpreters achieving a minimal level of
certification established by the [board] commission. A
provisional certification is limited to one year; during
such year the interpreter must be reevaluated and achieve
the next higher level of certification. If an evaluation
slot is not available during the term of the provisional
license, the interpreter may be granted an extension. A
holder of a provisional certification may only be granted
one extension.
209.317. 1. The [board] commission may suspend, deny
or revoke a certificate if an interpreter:
(1) Impersonates another person holding interpreter
certification;
(2) Allows another person to use the interpreter's
certificate;
(3) Uses fraud, deception or misrepresentation in the
certification process;
(4) Harasses, abuses or threatens a member of the
[board] commission, evaluation team or a support staff
person who is administering the system;
(5) Intentionally divulges confidential information
relating to the certification process, including content,
topic, vocabulary, skills or any other testing material;

SS SCS SB 890 52
(6) Fails to achieve a minimum satisfactory
certification level.
2. The [board] commission shall provide that any
hearing concerning the denial, suspension or revocation of a
certificate shall follow administrative procedures for
hearings as provided in chapter 621.
209.318. 1. There is hereby established in the state
treasury a fund to be known as the "Missouri Commission for
the Deaf and Hard of Hearing [Board of Certification of
Interpreters] Fund". All fees provided for in sections
209.287 to 209.318 shall be collected by the executive
director of the commission and shall be transmitted to the
department of revenue for deposit in the state treasury to
the credit of the Missouri commission for the deaf and hard
of hearing [board of certification of interpreters] fund.
Such funds, upon appropriation, shall be disbursed only for
payment of expenses of maintaining the [board] commission
and for the enforcement of the provisions of sections
209.287 to 209.318 and shall not be used to pay the salary
of the coordinator hired pursuant to section 209.289.
Warrants shall be drawn on the state treasury for payment
out of the fund.
2. The provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary
notwithstanding, money in this fund shall not be transferred
and placed to the credit of general revenue until the amount
in the fund at the end of the biennium exceeds two times the
amount of the appropriation from the fund for the preceding
fiscal year. The amount, if any, in the fund which shall
lapse is that amount in the fund which exceeds the
appropriate multiple of the appropriations from the fund for
the preceding fiscal year.

SS SCS SB 890 53
3. The expenses of maintaining the [board] commission
enforcement of the provisions of sections 209.287 to 209.318
during the first fiscal year shall be paid by the commission
from funds appropriated from general revenue for that
purpose.
209.321. 1. No person shall represent himself or
herself as an interpreter or engage in the practice of
interpreting as defined in section 209.285 in the state of
Missouri unless such person is licensed as required by the
provisions of sections 209.319 to 209.339.
2. A person registered, certified or licensed by this
state, another state or any recognized national
certification agent, acceptable to the committee that allows
that person to practice any other occupation or profession
in this state, is not considered to be interpreting if he or
she is in performance of the occupation or profession for
which he or she is registered, certified or licensed. The
professions referred to in this subsection include, but are
not limited to, physicians, psychologists, nurses, certified
public accountants, architects and attorneys.
3. A licensed interpreter shall limit his or her
practice to demonstrated areas of competence as documented
by relevant professional education, training, experience and
certification. An interpreter not trained in an area shall
not practice in that area without obtaining additional
relevant professional education, training and experience
through an acceptable program as defined by rule by the
Missouri commission for the deaf and hard of hearing.
4. A person is not considered to be interpreting
pursuant to the provisions of this section if, in a casual
setting and as defined by rule, a person is acting as an

SS SCS SB 890 54
interpreter gratuitously or is engaged in interpreting
incidental to traveling.
5. A person is not considered to be interpreting
pursuant to the provisions of this section if a person is
engaged as a telecommunications operator providing deaf
relay service or operator services for the deaf.
6. A person is not considered to be interpreting under
the provisions of this section if the person is currently
enrolled in an interpreter training program which has been
accredited by a certifying agency and approved by the
committee. The training program shall offer a degree in
interpreting from an accredited institution of higher
education. Persons exempted under this provision shall
engage only in activities and services that constitute part
of a supervised course of study and shall clearly designate
themselves by a title of the student, practicum student,
student interpreter, trainee, or intern.
7. A person holding a current certification of license
from another state or recognized national certification
system deemed acceptable by the committee is not considered
to be interpreting as defined in this chapter when
temporarily present in the state for the purpose of
providing interpreting services for a convention,
conference, meeting, professional group, or educational
field trip.
8. (1) The [board for certification of interpreters]
commission shall grant a provisional certificate in
education for any applicant who meets either of the
following criteria:
(a) The applicant possesses a current valid
certification in the Missouri interpreters certification

SS SCS SB 890 55
system at either the novice or apprentice level and holds a
valid license to provide interpreting services; or
(b) The applicant has submitted an application for
certification in the Missouri interpreters certification
system and an application for an interpreting license
pursuant to sections 209.319 to 209.339 and has taken the
written test and performance test or attests that he or she
will complete the certification and licensure applications
and take the written test within sixty days following the
date of application for a provisional certificate in
education and will complete the performance test within
sixty days following passage of the written test.
(2) The [board] commission shall issue the provisional
certificate in education within ten business days following
receipt of a complete application.
(3) A provisional certificate issued under paragraph
(a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be valid for
a term of three years and shall be renewed by the [board]
commission, upon request by the certificate holder, for one
additional term of three years if the certificate holder is
reevaluated during the first term of issuance and achieves a
higher level of certification in the Missouri interpreter
certification system.
(4) A provisional certificate issued under paragraph
(b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be valid for
one year and shall be renewed, upon request by the
certificate holder, pursuant to subdivision (3) of this
subsection if the certificate holder is reevaluated during
the term of issuance and achieves a certification in the
Missouri interpreter certification system. Such renewed
certificate shall be subject to the term length and renewal
provisions of subdivision (3) of this subsection.

SS SCS SB 890 56
(5) A provisional certificate in education shall be
limited to providing interpreters services in preschool,
elementary and secondary school settings or as allowed by
any other valid Missouri certification or license held by
the individual.
(6) A provisional certificate in education may be
revoked by the board if the person makes any
misrepresentations or fails to fulfill any commitment made
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, or violates the provisions of section 209.317 or
100 209.334 or breaks any of the ethical rules of conduct for
101 interpreters as established by state rule or fails to obtain
102 the necessary continuing education credits required for
103 certification maintenance.
209.322. The [board] commission shall recognize the
following certificates:
(1) National Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf
(NRID) certificates, which include Comprehensive Skills
Certificate (CSC), Certificate of Interpreting/Certificate
of Transliteration (CI/CT) and Certified Deaf Interpreter
(CDI);
(2) National Association of the Deaf (NAD) certificate
levels 3, 4 and 5; and
(3) A provisional public school certificate.
261.235. [1.] There is hereby created in the state
treasury for the use of the agriculture business development
division of the state department of agriculture a fund to be
known as "The AgriMissouri Fund". All moneys received by
the state department of agriculture for Missouri
agricultural products marketing development from any source,
including trademark fees, shall be deposited in the fund.
Moneys deposited in the fund shall, upon appropriation by

SS SCS SB 890 57
the general assembly to the state department of agriculture,
be expended by the agriculture business development division
of the state department of agriculture for promotion of
Missouri agricultural products under the AgriMissouri
program. The unexpended balance in the AgriMissouri fund at
the end of the biennium shall not be transferred to the
general revenue fund of the state treasury and accordingly
shall be exempt from the provisions of section 33.080
relating to transfer of funds to the ordinary revenue funds
of the state by the state treasurer.
[2. There is hereby created within the department of
agriculture the "AgriMissouri Advisory Commission for
Marketing Missouri Agricultural Products". The commission
shall establish guidelines, and make recommendations to the
director of agriculture, for the use of funds appropriated
by the general assembly for the agriculture business
development division of the department of agriculture, and
for all funds collected or appropriated to the AgriMissouri
fund created pursuant to subsection 1 of this section. The
guidelines shall focus on the promotion of the AgriMissouri
trademark associated with Missouri agricultural products
that have been approved by the general assembly, and shall
advance the following objectives:
(1) Increasing the impact and fostering the
effectiveness of local efforts to promote Missouri
agricultural products;
(2) Enabling and encouraging expanded advertising
efforts for Missouri agricultural products;
(3) Encouraging effective, high-quality advertising
projects, innovative marketing strategies, and the
coordination of local, regional and statewide marketing
efforts;

SS SCS SB 890 58
(4) Providing training and technical assistance to
cooperative-marketing partners of Missouri agricultural
products.
3. The commission may establish a fee structure for
sellers electing to use the AgriMissouri trademark
associated with Missouri agricultural products, so long as
the fees established and collected under this subsection do
not yield revenue greater than the total cost of
administering this section during the ensuing year. All
trademark fees shall be deposited to the credit of the
AgriMissouri fund, created pursuant to this section.
4. The commission shall consist of nine members
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the
senate. One member shall be the director of the agriculture
business development division of the department of
agriculture, or his or her representative. At least one
member shall be a specialist in advertising; at least one
member shall be a specialist in agribusiness; at least one
member shall be a specialist in the retail grocery business;
at least one member shall be a specialist in communications;
at least one member shall be a specialist in product
distribution; at least one member shall be a family farmer
with expertise in livestock farming; at least one member
shall be a family farmer with expertise in grain farming and
at least one member shall be a family farmer with expertise
in organic farming. Members shall serve for four-year
terms, except in the first appointments three members shall
be appointed for terms of four years, three members shall be
appointed for terms of three years and three members shall
be appointed for terms of two years each. Any member
appointed to fill a vacancy of an unexpired term shall be
appointed for the remainder of the term of the member

SS SCS SB 890 59
causing the vacancy. The governor shall appoint a
chairperson of the commission, subject to ratification by
the commission.
5. Commission members shall receive no compensation
but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their official duties on the
commission. The division of agriculture business
development of the department of agriculture shall provide
all necessary staff and support services as required by the
commission to hold commission meetings, to maintain records
of official acts and to conduct all other business of the
commission. The commission shall meet quarterly and at any
such time that it deems necessary. Meetings may be called
by the chairperson or by a petition signed by a majority of
the members of the commission. Ten days' notice shall be
given in writing to such members prior to the meeting date.
A simple majority of the members of the commission shall be
present to constitute a quorum. Proxy voting shall not be
permitted.
6. If the commission does establish a fee structure as
permitted under subsection 3 of this section, the
agriculture business development division of the department
of agriculture shall promulgate rules establishing the
commission's fee structure. The department of agriculture
shall also promulgate rules and regulations for the
implementation of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
100 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
101 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
102 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
103 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
104 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the

SS SCS SB 890 60
105 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
106 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
107 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
108 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
109 August 28, 2016, shall be invalid and void.]
288.040. 1. A claimant who is unemployed and has been
determined to be an insured worker shall be eligible for
benefits for any week only if the deputy finds that:
(1) The claimant has registered for work at and
thereafter has continued to report at an employment office
in accordance with such regulations as the division may
prescribe;
(2) The claimant is able to work and is available for
work. No person shall be deemed available for work unless
such person has been and is actively and earnestly seeking
work. Upon the filing of an initial or renewed claim, and
prior to the filing of each weekly claim thereafter, the
deputy shall notify each claimant of the number of work
search contacts required to constitute an active search for
work. Unless the deputy directs otherwise, a claimant shall
make a minimum of three work search contacts during any week
for which he or she claims benefits. No person shall be
considered not available for work, pursuant to this
subdivision, solely because he or she is a substitute
teacher or is on jury duty. A claimant shall not be
determined to be ineligible pursuant to this subdivision
because of not actively and earnestly seeking work if:
(a) The claimant is participating in training approved
pursuant to Section 236 of the Trade Act of 1974, as
amended, (19 U.S.C.A. Sec. 2296, as amended);
(b) The claimant is temporarily unemployed through no
fault of his or her own and has a definite recall date

SS SCS SB 890 61
within eight weeks of his or her first day of unemployment;
however, upon application of the employer responsible for
the claimant's unemployment, such eight-week period may be
extended not to exceed a total of sixteen weeks at the
discretion of the director;
(3) The claimant has reported to an office of the
division as directed by the deputy, but at least once every
four weeks, except that a claimant shall be exempted from
the reporting requirement of this subdivision if:
(a) The claimant is claiming benefits in accordance
with division regulations dealing with partial or temporary
total unemployment; or
(b) The claimant is temporarily unemployed through no
fault of his or her own and has a definite recall date
within eight weeks of his or her first day of unemployment;
or
(c) The director of the division of employment
security has determined that the claimant belongs to a group
or class of workers whose opportunities for reemployment
will not be enhanced by reporting, or is prevented from
reporting due to emergency conditions that limit access by
the general public to an office that serves the area where
the claimant resides, but only during the time such
circumstances exist.
Ineligibility pursuant to this subdivision shall begin on
the first day of the week which the claimant was scheduled
to claim and shall end on the last day of the week preceding
the week during which the claimant does report to the
division's office;
(4) Prior to the first week of a period of total or
partial unemployment for which the claimant claims benefits

SS SCS SB 890 62
he or she has been totally or partially unemployed for a
waiting period of one week. No more than one waiting week
will be required in any benefit year. During calendar year
2008 and each calendar year thereafter, the one-week waiting
period shall become compensable once his or her remaining
balance on the claim is equal to or less than the
compensable amount for the waiting period. No week shall be
counted as a week of total or partial unemployment for the
purposes of this subsection unless it occurs within the
benefit year which includes the week with respect to which
the claimant claims benefits;
(5) The claimant has made a claim for benefits within
fourteen days from the last day of the week being claimed.
The fourteen-day period may, for good cause, be extended to
twenty-eight days;
(6) The claimant has reported to an employment office
to participate in a reemployment assessment and reemployment
services as directed by the deputy or designated staff of an
employment office, unless the deputy determines that good
cause exists for the claimant's failure to participate in
such reemployment assessment and reemployment services. For
purposes of this section, "reemployment services" may
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) Providing an orientation to employment office
services;
(b) Providing job search assistance; and
(c) Providing labor market statistics or analysis;
Ineligibility under this subdivision shall begin on the
first day of the week which the claimant was scheduled to
report for the reemployment assessment or reemployment
services and shall end on the last day of the week preceding

SS SCS SB 890 63
the week during which the claimant does report in person to
the employment office for such reemployment assessment or
reemployment services;
(7) The claimant is participating in reemployment
services, such as job search assistance services, as
directed by the deputy if the claimant has been determined
to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and to need
reemployment services pursuant to a profiling system
established by the division, unless the deputy determines
that:
100 (a) The individual has completed such reemployment
101 services; or
102 (b) There is justifiable cause for the claimant's
103 failure to participate in such reemployment services.
104 2. A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting week
105 credit or benefits for any week for which the deputy finds
106 he or she is or has been suspended by his or her most recent
107 employer for misconduct connected with his or her work.
108 Suspensions of four weeks or more shall be treated as
109 discharges.
110 3. (1) Benefits based on "service in employment",
111 described in subsections 7 and 8 of section 288.034, shall
112 be payable in the same amount, on the same terms and subject
113 to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis
114 of other service subject to this law; except that:
115 (a) With respect to service performed in an
116 instructional, research, or principal administrative
117 capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not
118 be paid based on such services for any week of unemployment
119 commencing during the period between two successive academic
120 years or terms, or during a similar period between two
121 regular but not successive terms, or during a period of paid

SS SCS SB 890 64
122 sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's contract,
123 to any individual if such individual performs such services
124 in the first of such academic years (or terms) and if there
125 is a contract or a reasonable assurance that such individual
126 will perform services in any such capacity for any
127 educational institution in the second of such academic years
128 or terms;
129 (b) With respect to services performed in any capacity
130 (other than instructional, research, or principal
131 administrative capacity) for an educational institution,
132 benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to
133 any individual for any week which commences during a period
134 between two successive academic years or terms if such
135 individual performs such services in the first of such
136 academic years or terms and there is a contract or a
137 reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such
138 services in the second of such academic years or terms;
139 (c) With respect to services described in paragraphs
140 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, benefits shall not be paid
141 on the basis of such services to any individual for any week
142 which commences during an established and customary vacation
143 period or holiday recess if such individual performed such
144 services in the period immediately before such vacation
145 period or holiday recess, and there is reasonable assurance
146 that such individual will perform such services immediately
147 following such vacation period or holiday recess;
148 (d) With respect to services described in paragraphs
149 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, benefits payable on the
150 basis of services in any such capacity shall be denied as
151 specified in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this
152 subdivision to any individual who performed such services at
153 an educational institution while in the employ of an

SS SCS SB 890 65
154 educational service agency, and for this purpose the term
155 "educational service agency" means a governmental agency or
156 governmental entity which is established and operated
157 exclusively for the purpose of providing such services to
158 one or more educational institutions.
159 (2) If compensation is denied for any week pursuant to
160 paragraph (b) or (d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection
161 to any individual performing services at an educational
162 institution in any capacity (other than instructional,
163 research or principal administrative capacity), and such
164 individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such
165 services for the second of such academic years or terms,
166 such individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment
167 of the compensation for each week for which the individual
168 filed a timely claim for compensation and for which
169 compensation was denied solely by reason of paragraph (b) or
170 (d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
171 4. (1) A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting
172 week credit, benefits or shared work benefits for any week
173 for which he or she is receiving or has received
174 remuneration exceeding his or her weekly benefit amount or
175 shared work benefit amount in the form of:
176 (a) Compensation for temporary partial disability
177 pursuant to the workers' compensation law of any state or
178 pursuant to a similar law of the United States;
179 (b) A governmental or other pension, retirement or
180 retired pay, annuity, or other similar periodic payment
181 which is based on the previous work of such claimant to the
182 extent that such payment is provided from funds provided by
183 a base period or chargeable employer pursuant to a plan
184 maintained or contributed to by such employer; but, except
185 for such payments made pursuant to the Social Security Act

SS SCS SB 890 66
186 or the Railroad Retirement Act of 1974 (or the corresponding
187 provisions of prior law), the provisions of this paragraph
188 shall not apply if the services performed for such employer
189 by the claimant after the beginning of the base period (or
190 remuneration for such services) do not affect eligibility
191 for or increase the amount of such pension, retirement or
192 retired pay, annuity or similar payment.
193 (2) If the remuneration referred to in this subsection
194 is less than the benefits which would otherwise be due, the
195 claimant shall be entitled to receive for such week, if
196 otherwise eligible, benefits reduced by the amount of such
197 remuneration, and, if such benefit is not a multiple of one
198 dollar, such amount shall be lowered to the next multiple of
199 one dollar.
200 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (1)
201 and (2) of this subsection, if a claimant has contributed in
202 any way to the Social Security Act or the Railroad
203 Retirement Act of 1974, or the corresponding provisions of
204 prior law, no part of the payments received pursuant to such
205 federal law shall be deductible from the amount of benefits
206 received pursuant to this chapter.
207 5. A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting week
208 credit or benefits for any week for which or a part of which
209 he or she has received or is seeking unemployment benefits
210 pursuant to an unemployment insurance law of another state
211 or the United States; provided, that if it be finally
212 determined that the claimant is not entitled to such
213 unemployment benefits, such ineligibility shall not apply.
214 6. (1) A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting
215 week credit or benefits for any week for which the deputy
216 finds that such claimant's total or partial unemployment is
217 due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor

SS SCS SB 890 67
218 dispute in the factory, establishment or other premises in
219 which such claimant is or was last employed. In the event
220 the claimant secures other employment from which he or she
221 is separated during the existence of the labor dispute, the
222 claimant must have obtained bona fide employment as a
223 permanent employee for at least the major part of each of
224 two weeks in such subsequent employment to terminate his or
225 her ineligibility. If, in any case, separate branches of
226 work which are commonly conducted as separate businesses at
227 separate premises are conducted in separate departments of
228 the same premises, each such department shall for the
229 purposes of this subsection be deemed to be a separate
230 factory, establishment or other premises. This subsection
231 shall not apply if it is shown to the satisfaction of the
232 deputy that:
233 (a) The claimant is not participating in or financing
234 or directly interested in the labor dispute which caused the
235 stoppage of work; and
236 (b) The claimant does not belong to a grade or class
237 of workers of which, immediately preceding the commencement
238 of the stoppage, there were members employed at the premises
239 at which the stoppage occurs, any of whom are participating
240 in or financing or directly interested in the dispute.
241 (2) "Stoppage of work" as used in this subsection
242 means a substantial diminution of the activities, production
243 or services at the establishment, plant, factory or premises
244 of the employing unit. This definition shall not apply to a
245 strike where the employees in the bargaining unit who
246 initiated the strike are participating in the strike. Such
247 employees shall not be eligible for waiting week credit or
248 benefits during the period when the strike is in effect,
249 regardless of diminution, unless the employer has been found

SS SCS SB 890 68
250 guilty of an unfair labor practice by the National Labor
251 Relations Board or a federal court of law for an act or
252 actions preceding or during the strike.
253 7. On or after January 1, 1978, benefits shall not be
254 paid to any individual on the basis of any services,
255 substantially all of which consist of participating in
256 sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so
257 participate, for any week which commences during the period
258 between two successive sport seasons (or similar periods) if
259 such individual performed such services in the first of such
260 seasons (or similar periods) and there is a reasonable
261 assurance that such individual will perform such services in
262 the later of such seasons (or similar periods).
263 8. Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of
264 services performed by an alien, unless such alien is an
265 individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence
266 at the time such services were performed, was lawfully
267 present for purposes of performing such services, or was
268 permanently residing in the United States under color of law
269 at the time such services were performed (including an alien
270 who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of
271 the application of the provisions of Section 212(d)(5) of
272 the Immigration and Nationality Act).
273 (1) Any data or information required of individuals
274 applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not
275 payable to them because of their alien status shall be
276 uniformly required from all applicants for benefits.
277 (2) In the case of an individual whose application for
278 benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that
279 benefits to such individual are not payable because of such
280 individual's alien status shall be made except upon a
281 preponderance of the evidence.

SS SCS SB 890 69
282 9. A claimant shall be ineligible for waiting week
283 credit or benefits for any week such claimant has an
284 outstanding penalty which was assessed based upon an
285 overpayment of benefits, as provided for in subsection 9 of
286 section 288.380.
287 10. The directors of the division of employment
288 security and the [division] office of workforce development
289 shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house of
290 representatives, and the president pro tem of the senate no
291 later than October 15, 2006, a report outlining their
292 recommendations for how to improve work search verification
293 and claimant reemployment activities. The recommendations
294 shall include, but not limited to how to best utilize
295 "greathires.org", and how to reduce the average duration of
296 unemployment insurance claims. Each calendar year
297 thereafter, the directors shall submit a report containing
298 their recommendations on these issues by December thirty-
299 first of each year.
300 11. For purposes of this section, a claimant may
301 satisfy reporting requirements provided under this section
302 by reporting by internet communication or any other means
303 deemed acceptable by the division of employment security.
620.010. 1. There is hereby created a "Department of
Economic Development" to be headed by a director appointed
by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the
senate. All of the general provisions, definitions and
powers enumerated in section 1 of the Omnibus State
Reorganization Act of 1974 shall continue to apply to this
department and its divisions, agencies and personnel.
2. The powers, duties and functions vested in the
public service commission, chapters 386, 387, 388, 389, 390,
392, 393, and others, and the administrative hearing

SS SCS SB 890 70
commission, sections 621.015 to 621.198 and others, are
transferred by type III transfers to the department of
economic development. The director of the department is
directed to provide and coordinate staff and equipment
services to these agencies in the interest of facilitating
the work of the bodies and achieving optimum efficiency in
staff services common to all the bodies. Nothing in the
Reorganization Act of 1974 shall prevent the chairman of the
public service commission from presenting additional budget
requests or from explaining or clarifying its budget
requests to the governor or general assembly.
3. The powers, duties and functions vested in the
office of the public counsel are transferred by type III
transfer to the department of economic development. Funding
for the general counsel's office shall be by general revenue.
4. The public service commission is authorized to
employ such staff as it deems necessary for the functions
performed by the general counsel other than those powers,
duties and functions relating to representation of the
public before the public service commission.
5. All the powers, duties and functions vested in the
tourism commission, chapter 258 and others, are transferred
to the "Division of Tourism", which is hereby created, by
type III transfer.
6. All the powers, duties and functions of the
department of community affairs, chapter 251 and others, not
otherwise assigned, are transferred by type I transfer to
the department of economic development, and the department
of community affairs is abolished. The director of the
department of economic development may assume all the duties
of the director of community affairs or may establish within
the department such subunits and advisory committees as may

SS SCS SB 890 71
be required to administer the programs so transferred. The
director of the department shall appoint all members of such
committees and heads of subunits.
7. The Missouri housing development commission,
chapter 215, is assigned to the department of economic
development, but shall remain a governmental instrumentality
of the state of Missouri and shall constitute a body
corporate and politic.
8. [All the authority, powers, duties, functions,
records, personnel, property, matters pending and other
pertinent vestiges of the division of manpower planning of
the department of social services are transferred by a type
I transfer to the "Division of Workforce Development", which
is hereby created, within the department of economic
development. The division of manpower planning within the
department of social services is abolished. The provisions
of section 1 of the Omnibus State Reorganization Act of
1974, Appendix B, relating to the manner and procedures for
transfers of state agencies shall apply to the transfers
provided in this section.
9. All the authority, powers, functions, records,
personnel, property, contracts, matters pending and other
pertinent vestiges of the division of employment security
within the department of labor and industrial relations
related to job training and labor exchange that are funded
with or based upon Wagner-Peyser funds, and other federal
and state workforce development programs administered by the
division of employment security are transferred by a type I
transfer to the division of workforce development within the
department of economic development.
10.] Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the

SS SCS SB 890 72
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2008, shall be invalid and void.
643.173. [1.] There is hereby established within the
department of natural resources a "Small Business Technical
Assistance Program" which shall provide support and
assistance to small business. To the maximum extent
possible, the program shall be functionally separate from
the department's air pollution enforcement
responsibilities. The program shall advise regulated small
business regarding permit application requirements,
applicable provisions of 643.010 to 643.190[, and such other
matters affecting small business as deemed appropriate by
the committee]. The commission shall establish time frames
in which specific classes of deficiencies, except those
affecting public health or the environment, shall be
corrected.
[2. The small business technical assistance program
shall be advised by a "Small Business Compliance Advisory
Committee" which is hereby created. One member shall be
appointed by the director of the department, two members
shall be appointed by the governor to represent the public
and four owners of small businesses regulated under this
chapter shall be appointed by the general assembly, one each
appointed by the majority and minority leaders of each

SS SCS SB 890 73
chamber of the general assembly. No member of the air
conservation commission shall serve as a member of the small
business compliance advisory committee. The term of office
shall be four years except that of those first appointed,
one member appointed by the governor, one member appointed
by the senate and one member appointed by the house of
representatives shall be appointed to two-year terms.
Members shall serve until their successors are duly
appointed and qualified and vacancies shall be filled by
appointment for the remaining portion of the unexpired term
created by the vacancy. The members shall be reimbursed for
actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
their duties while in attendance at committee meetings.
3. The committee shall:
(1) Receive reports from the ombudsman pursuant to
section 643.175;
(2) Evaluate the impact of sections 643.010 to 643.190
and the rules promulgated thereunder on small business;
(3) Review and assess the impact of enforcement
policies on small business operations in Missouri;
(4) Recommend to the department, the commission and
the general assembly, as appropriate, changes in procedure,
in rules or in the law which would facilitate small business
compliance with sections 643.010 to 643.190;
(5) Recommend to the commission rules establishing an
expedited review of modifications for small businesses;
(6) Conduct hearings, determine facts and make
investigations consistent with the purposes of this section.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established
the "Career Readiness Course Task Force" to
explore the possibility of a course covering the
topics described in this section being offered
in the public schools to students in eighth

SS SCS SB 890 74
grade or ninth grade. Task force members shall
be chosen to represent the geographic diversity
of the state. All task force members shall be
appointed before October 31, 2018. The task
force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending
elementary school, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(2) A parent of a student attending a
grade not lower than the sixth nor higher than
the eighth grade, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(3) A parent of a student attending high
school, appointed by the joint committee on
education;
(4) An elementary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
the joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(5) Two education professionals giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in
accredited school districts, appointed by the
joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(6) Two secondary education professionals
from accredited school districts, appointed by
the joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(7) A career and technical education
professional who has experience serving as an
advisor to a statewide career and technical
education organization, appointed by a statewide
career and technical education organization;
(8) An education professional from an
accredited technical high school, appointed by a
statewide career and technical education
organization;
(9) A public school board member,
appointed by a statewide association of school
boards;

SS SCS SB 890 75
(10) A secondary school principal,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(13) Two school counselors from a school
giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth
grade, appointed by a statewide association of
school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college
counselor, appointed by a statewide association
of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional,
appointed by the division of workforce
development of economic development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project
Lead the Way, appointed by the statewide Project
Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the state
technical college, appointed by the state
technical college;
(19) A representative of a public
community college, appointed by a statewide
organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-
year institution of higher education, appointed
by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force
established under subsection 1 of this section
shall elect a chair from among the membership of
the task force. The task force shall meet as
needed to complete its consideration of the
course described in subsection 5 of this section
and provide its findings and recommendations as

SS SCS SB 890 76
described in subsection 6 of this section.
Members of the task force shall serve without
compensation. No school district policy or
administrative action shall require any
education employee member to use personal leave
or incur a reduction in pay for participating on
100 the task force.
101 3. The task force shall hold at least
102 three public hearings to provide an opportunity
103 to receive public testimony including, but not
104 limited to, testimony from educators, local
105 school boards, parents, representatives from
106 business and industry, labor and community
107 leaders, members of the general assembly, and
108 the general public.
109 4. The department of elementary and
110 secondary education shall provide such legal,
111 research, clerical, and technical services as
112 the task force may require in the performance of
113 its duties.
114 5. The task force established under
115 subsection 1 of this section shall consider a
116 course that:
117 (1) Gives students an opportunity to
118 explore various career and educational
119 opportunities by:
120 (a) Administering career surveys to
121 students and helping students use Missouri
122 Connections to determine their career interests
123 and develop plans to meet their career goals;
124 (b) Explaining the differences between
125 types of colleges, including two-year and four-
126 year colleges and noting the availability of
127 registered apprenticeship programs as
128 alternatives to college for students;
129 (c) Describing technical degrees offered
130 by colleges;
131 (d) Explaining the courses and educational
132 experiences offered at community colleges;
133 (e) Describing the various certificates
134 and credentials available to earn at the school
135 or other schools including, but not limited to,
136 career and technical education certificates

SS SCS SB 890 77
137 described under section 170.029 and industry-
138 recognized certificates and credentials;
139 (f) Advising students of any advanced
140 placement courses that they may take at the
141 school;
142 (g) Describing any opportunities at the
143 school for dual enrollment;
144 (h) Advising students of any Project Lead
145 the Way courses offered at the school and
146 explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help
147 students learn valuable skills;
148 (i) Informing students of the availability
149 of funding for postsecondary education through
150 the A+ schools program described under section
151 160.545;
152 (j) Describing the availability of virtual
153 courses;
154 (k) Describing the types of skills and
155 occupations most in demand in the current job
156 market and those skills and occupations likely
157 to be in high demand in future years;
158 (l) Describing the typical salaries for
159 occupations, salary trends, and opportunities
160 for advancement in various occupations;
161 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities
162 available in careers involving science,
163 technology, engineering, and math;
164 (n) Advising students of the resources
165 offered by workforce or job centers;
166 (o) Preparing students for the ACT
167 assessment or the ACT WorkKeys assessments
168 required for the National Career Readiness
169 Certificate;
170 (p) Administering a practice ACT
171 assessment or practice ACT WorkKeys assessments
172 required for the National Career Readiness
173 Certificate to students;
174 (q) Advising students of opportunities to
175 take the SAT and the Armed Services Vocational
176 Aptitude Battery;
177 (r) Administering a basic math test to
178 students so that they can assess their math
179 skills;

SS SCS SB 890 78
180 (s) Administering a basic writing test to
181 students so that they can assess their writing
182 skills;
183 (t) Helping each student prepare a
184 personal plan of study that outlines a sequence
185 of courses and experiences that concludes with
186 the student reaching his or her postsecondary
187 goals; and
188 (u) Explaining how to complete college
189 applications and the Free Application for
190 Federal Student Aid;
191 (2) Focuses on career readiness and
192 emphasizes the importance of work ethic,
193 communication, collaboration, critical thinking,
194 and creativity;
195 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a
196 four-year college is not the only pathway to
197 success by describing to students at least
198 sixteen pathways to success in detail and
199 including guest visitors who represent each
200 pathway described. In exploring how these
201 pathways could be covered in the course, the
202 task force shall consider how instructors for
203 the course may be able to rely on assistance
204 from Missouri's career pathways within the
205 department of elementary and secondary education;
206 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
207 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
208 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force
209 established under subsection 1 of this section
210 shall present its findings and recommendations
211 to the speaker of the house of representatives,
212 the president pro tempore of the senate, the
213 joint committee on education, and the state
214 board of education. Upon presenting the
215 findings and recommendations as described in
216 this subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established
the "Career Readiness Course Task Force" to
explore the possibility of a course covering the
topics described in this section being offered
in the public schools to students in eighth
grade or ninth grade. Task force members shall

SS SCS SB 890 79
be chosen to represent the geographic diversity
of the state. All task force members shall be
appointed before October 31, 2018. The task
force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending
elementary school, appointed by a statewide
association of parents and teachers;
(2) A parent of a student attending a
grade not lower than the sixth nor higher than
the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide
association of parents and teachers;
(3) A parent of a student attending high
school, appointed by a statewide association of
parents and teachers;
(4) An elementary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(5) An education professional giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in an
accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(6) A secondary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(7) A career and technical education
professional who has experience serving as an
advisor to a statewide career and technical
education organization, appointed by a statewide
career and technical education organization;
(8) An education professional from an
accredited technical high school, appointed by a
statewide career and technical education
organization;

SS SCS SB 890 80
(9) A public school board member,
appointed by a statewide association of school
boards;
(10) A secondary school principal,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(13) A school counselor from a school
giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth
grade, appointed by a statewide association of
school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college
counselor, appointed by a statewide association
of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional,
appointed by the division of workforce
development of the department of economic
development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project
Lead the Way, appointed by the statewide Project
Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the State
Technical College of Missouri, appointed by the
State Technical College of Missouri;
(19) A representative of a public
community college, appointed by a statewide
organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-
year institution of higher education, appointed
by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force
established under subsection 1 of this section
shall elect a chair from among the membership of

SS SCS SB 890 81
the task force. The task force shall meet as
needed to complete its consideration of the
course described in subsection 5 of this section
and provide its findings and recommendations as
described in subsection 6 of this section.
Members of the task force shall serve without
100 compensation. No school district policy or
101 administrative action shall require any
102 education employee member to use personal leave
103 or incur a reduction in pay for participating on
104 the task force.
105 3. The task force shall hold at least
106 three public hearings to provide an opportunity
107 to receive public testimony including, but not
108 limited to, testimony from educators, local
109 school boards, parents, representatives from
110 business and industry, labor and community
111 leaders, members of the general assembly, and
112 the general public.
113 4. The department of elementary and
114 secondary education shall provide such legal,
115 research, clerical, and technical services as
116 the task force may require in the performance of
117 its duties.
118 5. The task force established under
119 subsection 1 of this section shall consider a
120 course that:
121 (1) Gives students an opportunity to
122 explore various career and educational
123 opportunities by:
124 (a) Administering career surveys to
125 students and helping students use Missouri
126 Connections to determine their career interests
127 and develop plans to meet their career goals;
128 (b) Explaining the differences between
129 types of colleges, including two-year and four-
130 year colleges, and noting the availability of
131 registered apprenticeship programs as
132 alternatives to college for students;
133 (c) Describing technical degrees offered
134 by colleges;
135 (d) Explaining the courses and educational
136 experiences offered at community colleges;

SS SCS SB 890 82
137 (e) Describing the various certificates
138 and credentials available to earn at the school
139 or other schools including, but not limited to,
140 career and technical education certificates
141 described under section 170.029 and industry-
142 recognized certificates and credentials;
143 (f) Advising students of any advanced
144 placement courses that they may take at the
145 school;
146 (g) Describing any opportunities at the
147 school for dual enrollment;
148 (h) Advising students of any Project Lead
149 the Way courses offered at the school and
150 explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help
151 students learn valuable skills;
152 (i) Informing students of the availability
153 of funding for postsecondary education through
154 the A+ schools program described under section
155 160.545;
156 (j) Describing the availability of virtual
157 courses;
158 (k) Describing the types of skills and
159 occupations most in demand in the current job
160 market and those skills and occupations likely
161 to be in high demand in future years;
162 (l) Describing the typical salaries for
163 occupations, salary trends, and opportunities
164 for advancement in various occupations;
165 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities
166 available in careers involving science,
167 technology, engineering, and math;
168 (n) Advising students of the resources
169 offered by workforce or job centers;
170 (o) Preparing students for the ACT
171 assessment or the ACT WorkKeys assessments
172 required for the National Career Readiness
173 Certificate;
174 (p) Administering a practice ACT
175 assessment or practice ACT WorkKeys assessments
176 required for the National Career Readiness
177 Certificate to students;
178 (q) Advising students of opportunities to
179 take the SAT and the Armed Services Vocational
180 Aptitude Battery;

SS SCS SB 890 83
181 (r) Administering a basic math test to
182 students so that they can assess their math
183 skills;
184 (s) Administering a basic writing test to
185 students so that they can assess their writing
186 skills;
187 (t) Helping each student prepare a
188 personal plan of study that outlines a sequence
189 of courses and experiences that concludes with
190 the student reaching his or her postsecondary
191 goals; and
192 (u) Explaining how to complete college
193 applications and the Free Application for
194 Federal Student Aid;
195 (2) Focuses on career readiness and
196 emphasizes the importance of work ethic,
197 communication, collaboration, critical thinking,
198 and creativity;
199 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a
200 four-year college is not the only pathway to
201 success by describing to students at least
202 sixteen pathways to success in detail and
203 including guest visitors who represent each
204 pathway described. In exploring how these
205 pathways could be covered in the course, the
206 task force shall consider how instructors for
207 the course may be able to rely on assistance
208 from Missouri Career Pathways within the
209 department of elementary and secondary education;
210 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
211 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
212 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force
213 established under subsection 1 of this section
214 shall present its findings and recommendations
215 to the speaker of the house of representatives,
216 the president pro tempore of the senate, the
217 joint committee on education, and the state
218 board of education. Upon presenting the
219 findings and recommendations as described in
220 this subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[192.707. 1. The "Missouri Arthritis
Advisory Board" is established within the
department of health and senior services, as a

SS SCS SB 890 84
continuation of the arthritis advisory board in
existence on August 13, 1984. The board shall
consist of twenty-five members. The members of
the board that are serving on August 13, 1984,
shall continue until the expiration of this
term. The board shall submit a list of names to
the director as recommendations to fill expired
terms on the board. The director shall fill
each expired membership on the board, each of
the appointees to serve for a term of four years
and until his successor is appointed and
confirmed. Vacancies on the board arising from
reasons other than expiration of the member's
term shall be filled by the director for the
time remaining in the unexpired term.
2. The board shall meet semiannually and
at other such times as called by the chairman of
the board. The chairman shall be elected from
the board membership at the first board meeting,
and shall serve as chairman until a new chairman
is elected, or until his term on the board
expires, whichever occurs first.
3. The board shall serve in an advisory
capacity to the committee, and report annually
to the department and to the state board of
health and senior services regarding the
implementing of the statewide arthritis plan,
making recommendations for necessary changes in
content and direction.
4. The board shall be responsible for
development and recommendations of guidelines
for programs supported under the state arthritis
program, and make recommendations on program
relevance of grant applications funded under the
state arthritis program. The board will make
final recommendations to the director regarding
programs and grants of the state arthritis
program.
5. Any reimbursement of members of the
board for their actual and necessary expenses
shall be subject to appropriations.]
[192.710. 1. The "Arthritis Program
Review Committee" is hereby created within the

SS SCS SB 890 85
department of health and senior services. This
committee shall consist of fifteen members, two
from each of the seven regions set forth in
section 192.714 and one at-large member. The
fourteen regional members shall be nominated to
the committee by the board. The one at-large
member shall be nominated by the state board of
health and senior services. The members of the
committee shall include at least one from each
of the following categories: rheumatology
educators, practicing rheumatologists, primary
care practitioners, nurses, allied health
professionals, arthritis patients, and members
of the general public. Members of the committee
shall be appointed by the director in
consultation with the board of health and senior
services. Of the fifteen initial members, five
shall have a two-year term, five shall have a
three-year term, and five shall have a four-year
term. Thereafter, each member shall serve a
four-year term and until his successor is
appointed and confirmed. Vacancies on the
committee arising from reasons other than
expiration of the member's term shall be filled
by the director for the time remaining in the
unexpired term.
2. The committee shall meet annually and
at other such times as called by the chairman of
the committee. The chairman shall be elected
annually from the committee membership at the
first committee meeting and shall serve as
chairman until a new chairman is elected, or
until his term on the committee expires,
whichever occurs first.
3. The committee shall review, make site
visits and determine and make recommendations to
the board on the merit of regional arthritis
center applications. No program or other
activity will be recommended for funding by the
board without the favorable review of the
committee.
4. The arthritis program coordinator shall
serve the committee as its executive
administrator.]

SS SCS SB 890 86
[192.712. Committee and board members
shall serve without compensation, but their
expenses incurred in carrying out their official
duties shall, subject to appropriations, be
reimbursed by the state.]
[192.716. Beginning upon receipt of
appropriations for that purpose and subject to
the availability of appropriations, but not
before October 1, 1984, the arthritis centers
established pursuant to section 192.714 shall
operate programs in the following areas:
(1) Education at all levels for various
health professionals; and
(2) Improved patient care and other
arthritis control activities aimed at
benefitting communities served by the center.]
[192.718. 1. Beginning upon receipt of
appropriations for that purpose and subject to
the availability of appropriations, but not
before October 1, 1984, each year the board may
grant three one-year, state-supported clinical
rheumatology fellowships which might include
four to six months of a community-based
experience in one or more of the regional
arthritis centers and six to eight months at an
academic institution in this state which is
willing and qualified to train rheumatology
fellows.
2. A candidate for a fellowship granted
pursuant to this section shall be approved by
the director, the board, the academic
institution, and the regional arthritis center
director.
3. Each fellowship granted pursuant to
this section shall consist of an appropriate
stipend and either adequate housing or a housing
allowance in an amount to be determined by the
board.]
[192.720. 1. Beginning upon receipt of
appropriations for that purpose and subject to
the availability of appropriations, but not
before October 1, 1984, support shall be

SS SCS SB 890 87
provided for three academic rheumatology
trainees annually, for pursuit of training with
academic institutions in the state.
2. Such support shall consist of an
appropriate stipend and an additional budget for
expenses for each trainee each year as
recommended by the board.
3. A candidate for academic rheumatology
training granted pursuant to this section shall
be approved by the director, the board and the
academic institution.]
[192.723. Beginning upon receipt of
appropriations for that purpose and subject to
the availability of appropriations, but not
before July 1, 1985, innovative research
feasibility studies which cannot be funded by
traditional mechanisms and which have
significance for having impact on the state
arthritis problem may be carried out by
arthritis centers established pursuant to
section 192.714.]
[192.725. Beginning upon receipt of
appropriations for that purpose and subject to
the availability of appropriations, but not
before July 1, 1985, a statewide "Arthritis
Information Network" shall be established,
consisting of a statewide WATS telephone system,
staffed by volunteers insofar as possible.]
[196.1103. The management, governance, and
control of moneys appropriated from the life
sciences research trust fund shall be vested in
the "Life Sciences Research Board" which is
hereby created in the department of economic
development as a type III agency and which shall
consist of seven members. The following
provisions shall apply to the life sciences
research board and its members:
(1) Each member shall be appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the
senate pursuant to the procedures herein set
forth for a term of four years; except that, of
the initial members of the board appointed,

SS SCS SB 890 88
three shall be appointed for two-year terms and
four shall be appointed to four-year terms;
(2) The members of the board shall be
generally familiar with the life sciences and
current research trends and developments with
either technical or scientific expertise in life
sciences and with an understanding of the
application of the results of life sciences
research. The appointment of a person to the
life sciences research committee created by
Executive Order 01-10 issued by the governor on
July 23, 2001, shall not disqualify a person
from serving as a member, either
contemporaneously or later, on the life sciences
research board;
(3) No member of the life sciences
research board shall serve more than two
consecutive full four-year terms;
(4) The members of the life sciences
research board shall receive no salary or other
compensation for their services as a member of
the board, but shall receive reimbursement for
their actual and necessary expenses incurred in
performance of their duties as members of the
board.]
[196.1124. No member of the life sciences
research board shall be employed by any public
or private not-for-profit entity entitled to
receive financial support from the life sciences
research trust fund, or participate in the
making of any decision by the board to make any
grant to the board member, any person who is
related to the board member within the fourth
degree of consanguinity or affinity, any public
entity for which the board member serves as an
officer, director, or other member of the
entity's governing body, or any private entity
for which the board member or the member's
spouse is employed, serves as an officer,
director, or other member of the entity's
governing body. The board may from time to time
issue conflict of interest guidelines and
requirements with respect to the administration

SS SCS SB 890 89
of the life sciences research program, to govern
the actions of its employees and agents, and to
implement the provisions of this section.]
[197.165. 1. The department shall appoint
an "Infection Control Advisory Panel" for the
purposes of implementing sections 192.131 and
192.667.
2. Members of the infection control
advisory panel shall include:
(1) Two public members;
(2) Three board-certified or board-
eligible physicians licensed pursuant to chapter
334 who are affiliated with a Missouri hospital
or medical school, active members of the Society
for Health Care Epidemiology of America, and
have demonstrated interest and expertise in
health facility infection control;
(3) One physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 334 who is active in the practice of
medicine in Missouri and who holds medical staff
privileges at a Missouri hospital;
(4) Four infection control practitioners
certified by the certification board of
infection control and epidemiology, at least two
of whom shall be practicing in a rural hospital
or setting and at least two of whom shall be
registered professional nurses licensed under
chapter 335;
(5) A medical statistician with an
advanced degree in such specialty;
(6) A clinical microbiologist with an
advanced degree in such specialty;
(7) Three employees of the department,
representing the functions of hospital,
ambulatory surgical center, and abortion
facility licensure, epidemiology and health data
analysis, who shall serve as ex officio
nonvoting members of the panel.
3. Reasonable expenses of the panel shall
be paid from private donations made specifically
for that purpose to the "Infection Control
Advisory Panel Fund", which is hereby created in
the state treasury. If such donations are not

SS SCS SB 890 90
received from private sources, then the
provisions of this act shall be implemented
without the advisory panel.]
[208.530. As used in sections 208.530 to
208.535, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Commission", the commission on the
special health, psychological and social needs
of minority older individuals established in
section 208.533;
(2) "Minority older individual", an
individual who is sixty years of age or older
and a member of a racial minority group;
(3) "Racial minority group":
(a) Blacks or African Americans;
(b) Native Americans;
(c) Hispanics;
(d) Asian Americans; and
(e) Other similar racial minority groups.]
[208.533. 1. There is hereby established
a twenty-member "Commission on the Special
Health, Psychological and Social Needs of
Minority Older Individuals" under the department
of health and senior services. The commission
shall consist of the following members:
(1) The directors of the departments of
health and senior services, mental health and
social services or their designees;
(2) The directors of the office of
minority health and the department of health and
senior services who shall serve as cochairs of
the commission;
(3) Two members of the Missouri house of
representatives, one from each major political
party represented in the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
house who shall serve in a nonvoting, advisory
capacity;
(4) Two members of the senate, one from
each major political party represented in the
senate, appointed by the president pro tem of
the senate who shall serve in a nonvoting,
advisory capacity;

SS SCS SB 890 91
(5) A representative of the office of the
lieutenant governor who shall serve in a
nonvoting, advisory capacity; and
(6) Ten individuals appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the
senate who are currently working in the field of
minority elderly health, psychological or social
problems who have demonstrated expertise in one
or more of the following areas: treatment of
cardiovascular, cancer and diabetic conditions;
nutrition; community-based health services;
legal services; elderly consumer advocacy;
gerontology or geriatrics; social work and other
related services including housing. At least
two of the individuals appointed by the governor
shall be minority older individuals. The
members appointed by the governor shall be
residents of Missouri. Any vacancy on the
commission shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment.
2. Members appointed by the governor shall
serve for three-year terms. Other members,
except legislative members, shall serve for as
long as they hold the position which made them
eligible for appointment. Legislative members
shall serve during their current term of office
but may be reappointed.
3. Members of the commission shall not be
compensated for their services, but shall be
reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties.
The office of administration and the departments
of health and senior services, mental health and
social services shall provide such support as
the commission requires to aid it in the
performance of its duties.]
[208.535. The responsibilities of the
commission shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(1) The commission shall annually prepare
a report identifying the special needs of the
minority older population in Missouri as
compared to the older population at-large and

SS SCS SB 890 92
make recommendations for meeting those needs.
The report shall be completed no later than
October first of each year, beginning in 1999,
and copies transmitted to the governor, the
general assembly and appropriate state
agencies. The report shall, at a minimum:
(a) Contain an overview of the special
health, psychological and social needs of
minority older Missourians with particular
attention to low-income minority older
individuals;
(b) Identify specific diseases and health
conditions for which minority older individuals
are at greater risk than the general population;
(c) Identify problems experienced by
minority older individuals in obtaining services
from governmental agencies;
(d) Identify programs at the state and
local level designed to specifically meet the
needs of minority older individuals; and
(e) Recommend program improvements and
services at the state and local level designed
to address the special unmet needs of the
minority older population;
(2) In preparing the report required by
this section, the commission shall solicit and
consider the input of individuals and
organizations representing the concerns of the
minority older population, with particular
attention to the service needs of those with
incomes below the federal poverty level,
concerning:
(a) Programs and services needed by
minority older individuals;
(b) The extent to which existing programs
do not meet the needs of minority older
individuals;
(c) The accessibility of existing programs
to minority older individuals;
(d) The availability and adequacy of
information regarding existing services;
(e) Health problems that minority older
individuals experience at a higher rate than the
nonminority older population; and

SS SCS SB 890 93
(f) Financial, social and other barriers
experienced by minority older individuals in
obtaining needed services;
(3) Conduct an outreach program that
provides information to minority older
Missourians about health, psychological and
social problems experienced by minority older
individuals and available programs to address
those problems, as identified in the report
prepared pursuant to this section.]
[208.850. Title.
Sections 208.850 to 208.871 shall be known
as and may be cited as "The Quality Home Care
Act".]
[208.853. Findings and purposes.
The people of the state of Missouri find as
follows:
(1) Thousands of Missouri senior citizens
and people with disabilities continue to live
independently in their own homes and avoid
placement in institutions such as nursing homes
only as the result of the availability of
qualified personal care attendants who assist
them with the activities of daily living.
(2) Many Missouri senior citizens and
people with disabilities who could not otherwise
afford personal care assistance services in
their own homes receive the services with
assistance provided by the state and federal
governments under the Missouri consumer directed
services program.
(3) The United States Supreme Court has
mandated that states provide services to persons
with disabilities "in community settings rather
than in institutions" when remaining in the
community is appropriate, consistent with the
wishes of the disabled person, and can be
reasonably accommodated.
(4) In-home care is not only the choice of
most senior citizens and people with
disabilities, it is less costly than
institutional care such as that provided in

SS SCS SB 890 94
nursing homes and thus saves Missouri taxpayers
significant amounts of money.
(5) The consumer directed services program
permits the consumers of these highly intimate
and personal services to hire, terminate and
supervise the individual providing the services,
but it does not currently give consumers any
role in setting wage rates for personal care
attendants.
(6) Personal care attendants generally
receive low wages, minimal or no benefits,
little if any training, and have no meaningful
input into their terms and conditions of
employment and no meaningful means of making
suggestions for improvements in the consumer
directed services program.
(7) The continued availability of quality
home care services is threatened by a looming
shortage of qualified personal care attendants
due to the aging population in the state as well
as low wages, a lack of benefits, and high rates
of occupational injury. These poor working
conditions also contribute to high turnover
among personal care attendants that impairs the
continuity of care.
(8) The safety of home care services is
threatened by both the failure of existing
safeguards to protect consumers from potentially
abusive attendants and lengthy delays in
processing background checks as recently
documented by the state auditor.
(9) The continued availability of quality,
safe home care services can be ensured through
the creation of the "Missouri Quality Home Care
Council" with authority to investigate the
quality, safety and availability of home care
services, recruit eligible personal care
attendants, recommend qualifications for
personal care attendants, improve the training
of personal care attendants, establish a
statewide list of eligible personal care
attendants, refer consumers to eligible personal
care attendants, engage in collective bargaining
with a representative of personal care

SS SCS SB 890 95
attendants, and recommend changes in personal
care attendants' wages and benefits to the
general assembly.]
[208.856. The Missouri Quality Home Care
Council.
1. Effective January 31, 2009, the
Missouri quality home care council is hereby
created to ensure the availability and improve
the quality of home care services by recruiting,
training and stabilizing the personal care
attendant workforce. Expenses of the council in
carrying out its powers and duties shall be paid
from any appropriations for that purpose by the
general assembly. The council shall be assigned
to the department of health and senior services
with supervision by the department extending
only to budgeting and reporting as provided by
subdivisions (4) and (5) of subsection 6 of
section 1 of the Reorganization Act of 1974.
Supervision by the department shall not extend
to matters relating to policies, regulatory
functions or other matters specifically
delegated to the council by sections 208.850 to
208.871 and the director of the department or
any employee of the department, either directly
or indirectly, shall not participate or
interfere with the activities of the council in
any manner not specifically provided by law.
2. The council shall consist of eleven
members appointed by the governor with the
advice and consent of the senate as follows:
(1) Six members shall be current or former
recipients of personal care assistance services
under the consumer directed services program, or
its successor program or programs. Two of the
consumer members shall have received services
for a period of at least one year, two shall
have received services for a period of at least
two years, and two shall have received services
for a period of at least three years. In order
to ensure that at least one of the consumer
members has personal knowledge of challenges
rural consumers face, at least one of these

SS SCS SB 890 96
members shall be a resident of a third class
county;
(2) One member shall be a representative
of the Missouri department of health and senior
services, or its successor entity;
(3) Two members shall be representatives
of Missouri centers for independent living, or
their successor entities;
(4) One member shall be a representative
of the governor's council on disabilities, or
its successor entity;
(5) One member shall be a representative
of the governor's advisory council on aging, or
its successor entity.
3. Each member of the council shall serve
a term of three years, except the first eleven
members who shall serve staggered terms as
follows: three recipient members and the
department of health and senior services member
shall serve one-year terms, two recipient
members and one centers for independent living
member shall serve two-year terms, and one
recipient member, one centers for independent
living member, and the council on disabilities
and advisory council on aging members shall
serve three-year terms. The initial members of
the council shall be appointed by the governor
by March 1, 2009. If a vacancy occurs, the
governor will appoint a replacement for the
remainder of the departing member's term.
Commission members shall be eligible for
reappointment but shall serve no more than two
terms. In making appointments, the governor
shall consider nominations or recommendations
from the agencies or groups represented on the
council. Members of the council shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed
their actual and necessary expenses. The
governor may remove a council member for good
cause.]
[208.859. The powers and duties of the
council.

SS SCS SB 890 97
The council shall have the following powers
and duties:
(1) Assess the size, quality and stability
of the home care workforce in Missouri and the
ability of the existing workforce to meet the
growing and changing needs of both aging and
disabled consumers;
(2) Encourage eligible individuals to
serve as personal care attendants;
(3) Provide training on a voluntary basis,
either directly or through contracts, in
cooperation with vendors, as defined in
subdivision (5) of section 208.865, for
prospective and current personal care
attendants;
(4) Recommend minimum qualifications for
personal care attendants to the department of
health and senior services;
(5) Establish and maintain a statewide
list of eligible, available personal care
attendants, in cooperation with vendors,
including attendants available to provide
respite and replacement services. In order to
facilitate the creation of such a list, all
vendors shall provide the council with the list
of persons eligible to be a personal care
attendant which vendors are required to maintain
under subsection 4 of section 208.906 and
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
208.918. The council shall ensure that all
personal care attendants placed on the statewide
list are registered with the family care safety
registry as provided in sections 210.900 to
210.936 and are not listed on any of the
background check lists in the family care safety
registry, absent a good cause waiver obtained
from the department pursuant to section
192.2495. All consumers seeking personal care
attendants, whether or not they are participants
in the consumer directed services program, shall
have access to the statewide list;
(6) Provide routine, emergency, respite,
and replacement referrals of eligible and

SS SCS SB 890 98
available personal care attendants to vendors
and consumers;
(7) In cooperation with the Missouri state
highway patrol, the department of social
services' children's division, the department of
mental health, the department of health and
senior services, and vendors and on an on-going
basis, assess existing mechanisms for preventing
abuse and neglect of consumers in the home care
setting and recommend improvements to those
agencies and the general assembly. As part of
this duty, members and employees of the council
shall have access to the employee
disqualification list established in section
192.2490 and the family care safety registry.
Members and employees of the council shall
report to the department of health and senior
services when they have reasonable cause to
believe that a consumer has been abused or
neglected as defined in section 192.2400,
subject to the same standards set forth in
section 208.912;
(8) Recommend the wage rate or rates to be
paid personal care attendants and any economic
benefits to be received by personal care
attendants to the general assembly. The
department shall retain its existing authority
to establish the Medicaid reimbursement rate for
personal care assistance services under
subsection 2 of section 208.903;
(9) Establish other terms and conditions
of employment of personal care attendants
consistent with consumers' right to hire, fire,
train, and supervise personal care attendants;
(10) Cooperate with the department of
health and senior services and vendors to
improve the provision of personal care
assistance services;
(11) In carrying out its powers and duties
under sections 208.850 to 208.871, the council
may:
(a) Make and execute contracts and all
other instruments necessary or convenient for

SS SCS SB 890 99
the performance of its duties or exercise of its
powers;
(b) Issue rules under the Missouri
administrative procedures act, chapter 536, as
necessary for the purposes and policies of
sections 208.850 to 208.871. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section, shall
become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
100 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
101 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if
102 any of the powers vested with the general
103 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
104 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and
105 annul a rule are subsequently held
106 unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
107 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
108 August 28, 2008, shall be invalid and void;
109 (c) Establish offices, employ an executive
110 director and such other staff as is necessary to
111 carry out its functions and fix their
112 compensation, retain contractors as necessary
113 and prescribe their duties and power, incur
114 expenses, and create such liabilities as are
115 reasonable and proper for the administration of
116 sections 208.850 to 208.871;
117 (d) Solicit and accept for use any grant
118 of money, services or property from the federal
119 government, the state, or any political
120 subdivision or agency thereof, including federal
121 matching funds under Title XIX of the federal
122 Social Security Act, and do all things necessary
123 to cooperate with the federal government, the
124 state, or any political subdivision or agency
125 thereof in making an application for any grant;
126 (e) Keep records and engage in research
127 and the gathering of relevant statistics;
128 (f) Acquire, hold, or dispose of personal
129 property or any interest therein, and contract
130 for, lease, or otherwise provide facilities for
131 the activities conducted under this measure;
132 (g) Sue and be sued in its own name;

SS SCS SB 890 100
133 (h) Delegate to the appropriate persons
134 the power to execute contracts and other
135 instruments on its behalf and delegate any of
136 its powers and duties if consistent with the
137 purposes of sections 208.850 to 208.871; and
138 (i) Do other acts necessary or convenient
139 to execute the powers expressly granted to it.]
[208.862. 1. Consumers shall retain the
right to hire, fire, supervise, and train
personal care attendants.
2. Vendors shall continue to perform the
functions provided in sections 208.900 to
208.930. In addition to having a philosophy
that promotes the consumer's ability to live
independently in the most integrated setting or
the maximum community inclusion of persons with
physical disabilities, as required by subsection
1 of section 208.918, vendors shall provide to
consumers advocacy, independent living skills
training, peer counseling, and information and
referral services, as those terms are used in
subsection 3 of section 178.656.
3. The council shall be a public body as
that term is defined in section 105.500, and
personal care attendants shall be employees of
the council solely for purposes of sections
105.500 to 105.598.
4. The sole bargaining unit of personal
care attendants, as that term is defined in
section 105.500, shall be a statewide unit.
Personal care attendants who are related to or
members of the family of the consumer to whom
they provide services shall not for that reason
be excluded from the unit. The state board of
mediation shall conduct an election, by mail
ballot, to determine whether an organization
shall be designated the exclusive bargaining
representative as defined in section 105.500 for
the statewide unit of personal care attendants
under section 105.525 upon a showing that ten
percent of the personal care attendants in said
unit want to be represented by a
representative. The Missouri office of

SS SCS SB 890 101
administration shall represent the council in
any collective bargaining with a representative
of personal care attendants. Upon completion of
bargaining, any agreements shall be reduced to
writing and presented to the council for
adoption, modification or rejection.
5. The state of Missouri and all vendors
shall cooperate in the implementation of any
agreements reached by the council and any
representative of personal care attendants,
including making any payroll deductions
authorized by the agreements which can lawfully
be made pursuant to agreements entered into
under sections 105.500 to 105.598 as currently
construed by the Missouri appellate courts.
6. Personal care attendants shall not have
the right to strike and breach of this
prohibition will result in disqualification from
participation in the consumer directed services
program.
7. Personal care attendants shall not be
considered employees of the state of Missouri or
any vendor for any purpose.
8. (1) The provisions of sections 105.500
to 105.598 shall apply to all personal care
attendants, organizations elected as the
exclusive bargaining representative of the
bargaining unit of personal care attendants
under this section, and all officers and
employees of such organizations. For purposes
of this subsection, organizations elected as the
exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit under this section shall be
considered a labor organization, as that term is
defined in section 105.500.
(2) If an organization is not recertified
or is decertified as the exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit of personal
care attendants under section 105.575, any
subsequent certification of an organization as
exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of personal care attendants
shall be conducted according to the provisions

SS SCS SB 890 102
of section 105.575, notwithstanding subsection 4
of this section to the contrary.]
[208.865. Definitions.
As used in sections 208.850 to 208.871:
(1) "Consumer" means a person receiving
personal care assistance services from a
personal care attendant as defined in
subdivision (4) of this section;
(2) "Council" means the Missouri quality
home care council;
(3) "Department" means the Missouri
department of health and senior services;
(4) "Personal care attendant" means a
person, other than a consumer's spouse,
providing consumer-directed personal care
assistance services as defined in subdivisions
(2) and (5) of section 208.900 under sections
208.900 to 208.927, similar consumer-directed
personal care assistance services under section
208.930, and similar consumer-directed personal
care assistance services through a program
operated pursuant to a waiver obtained under
Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security
Act or similar consumer-directed services under
the successor to any of said programs;
(5) "Vendor" is defined in subdivision
(10) of section 208.900 and in subsection 2 of
section 208.862.]
[208.868. Federal approval and funding.
The council and the state of Missouri shall
take all actions reasonably necessary to obtain
any approval from the United States needed to
implement any part of sections 208.850 to
208.871 and to ensure continued federal funding
of any program governed by sections 208.850 to
208.871.]
[208.871. Severability.
If any section, subsection, subdivision,
paragraph, sentence, or clause of sections
208.850 to 208.871 is held to be invalid or
unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect
any remaining portion, section, or part thereof

SS SCS SB 890 103
which can be given effect without the invalid
provision.]
[209.287. 1. There is hereby established
within the Missouri commission for the deaf and
hard of hearing a board to be known as the
"Board for Certification of Interpreters", which
shall be composed of three members. The
executive director of the Missouri commission
for the deaf and hard of hearing or the
director's designee shall be a nonvoting member
of the board.
2. The members shall be appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the
senate from a list of recommendations from the
commission. The members shall be appointed for
terms of three years. No member shall be
eligible to serve more than two consecutive
terms, except a person appointed to fill a
vacancy for a partial term may serve two
additional terms. One of the members appointed
shall be deaf, one shall be a certified
interpreter, and one shall be deaf or a
certified interpreter. The members shall be
fluent in American sign language, Pidgin Signed
English, oral, tactile sign, or any specialized
vocabulary used by deaf persons. The member
shall have a background and knowledge of
interpreting and evaluation.
3. The members shall receive no
compensation for their services on the board,
but the commission shall reimburse the members
for actual and necessary expenses incurred in
the performance of their official duties. The
board shall meet not less than two times per
year. The board shall elect from its membership
a chairperson and a secretary. A quorum of the
board shall consist of two of its members.
4. Any member of the commission may
petition the governor to remove a member from
the board for the following reasons:
misconduct, inefficiency, incompetence or
neglect of his official duties. The governor
may remove the member after giving the committee

SS SCS SB 890 104
member written notice of the charges against him
or her and an opportunity to be heard pursuant
to administrative procedures in chapter 621.]
[210.102. 1. There is hereby established
within the department of elementary and
secondary education the "Coordinating Board for
Early Childhood", which shall constitute a body
corporate and politic, and shall include, but
not be limited to, the following members:
(1) A representative from the governor's
office;
(2) A representative from each of the
following departments: health and senior
services, mental health, social services, and
elementary and secondary education;
(3) A representative of the judiciary;
(4) A representative of the family and
community trust board (FACT);
(5) A representative from the head start
program; and
(6) Nine members appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate who
are representatives of the groups, such as
business, philanthropy, civic groups, faith-
based organizations, parent groups, advocacy
organizations, early childhood service
providers, and other stakeholders.
The coordinating board may make all rules it
deems necessary to enable it to conduct its
meetings, elect its officers, and set the terms
and duties of its officers. The coordinating
board shall elect from amongst its members a
chairperson, vice chairperson, a secretary-
reporter, and such other officers as it deems
necessary. Members of the board shall serve
without compensation but may be reimbursed for
actual expenses necessary to the performance of
their official duties for the board.
2. The coordinating board for early
childhood shall have the power to:
(1) Develop a comprehensive statewide long-
range strategic plan for a cohesive early
childhood system;

SS SCS SB 890 105
(2) Confer with public and private
entities for the purpose of promoting and
improving the development of children from birth
through age five of this state;
(3) Identify legislative recommendations
to improve services for children from birth
through age five;
(4) Promote coordination of existing
services and programs across public and private
entities;
(5) Promote research-based approaches to
services and ongoing program evaluation;
(6) Identify service gaps and advise
public and private entities on methods to close
such gaps;
(7) Apply for and accept gifts, grants,
appropriations, loans, or contributions to the
coordinating board for early childhood fund from
any source, public or private, and enter into
contracts or other transactions with any federal
or state agency, any private organizations, or
any other source in furtherance of the purpose
of subsection 1 of this section and this
subsection, and take any and all actions
necessary to avail itself of such aid and
cooperation;
(8) Direct disbursements from the
coordinating board for early childhood fund as
provided in this section;
(9) Administer the coordinating board for
early childhood fund and invest any portion of
the moneys not required for immediate
disbursement in obligations of the United States
or any agency or instrumentality of the United
States, in obligations of the state of Missouri
and its political subdivisions, in certificates
of deposit and time deposits, or other
obligations of banks and savings and loan
associations, or in such other obligations as
may be prescribed by the board;
(10) Purchase, receive, take by grant,
gift, devise, bequest or otherwise, lease, or
otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, employ,
use, and otherwise deal with real or personal

SS SCS SB 890 106
property or any interests therein, wherever
situated;
(11) Sell, convey, lease, exchange,
transfer or otherwise dispose of all or any of
its property or any interest therein, wherever
situated;
(12) Employ and fix the compensation of an
executive director and such other agents or
employees as it considers necessary;
(13) Adopt, alter, or repeal by its own
bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the
manner in which its business may be transacted;
(14) Adopt and use an official seal;
(15) Assess or charge fees as the board
determines to be reasonable to carry out its
100 purposes;
101 (16) Make all expenditures which are
102 incident and necessary to carry out its purposes;
103 (17) Sue and be sued in its official name;
104 (18) Take such action, enter into such
105 agreements, and exercise all functions necessary
106 or appropriate to carry out the duties and
107 purposes set forth in this section.
108 3. There is hereby created the
109 "Coordinating Board for Early Childhood Fund"
110 which shall consist of the following:
111 (1) Any moneys appropriated by the general
112 assembly for use by the board in carrying out
113 the powers set out in subsections 1 and 2 of
114 this section;
115 (2) Any moneys received from grants or
116 which are given, donated, or contributed to the
117 fund from any source;
118 (3) Any moneys received as fees authorized
119 under subsections 1 and 2 of this section;
120 (4) Any moneys received as interest on
121 deposits or as income on approved investments of
122 the fund;
123 (5) Any moneys obtained from any other
124 available source.
125 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
126 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the
127 coordinating board for early childhood fund at

SS SCS SB 890 107
128 the end of the biennium shall not revert to the
129 credit of the general revenue fund.]
[650.125. 1. The provisions of this
section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Cybersecurity Act".
2. There is hereby established within the
department of public safety the "Missouri
Cybersecurity Commission". The commission shall
have as its purpose identifying risk to and
vulnerability of the state and critical
infrastructure with regard to cyber attacks of
any nature from within or outside the United
States and advising the governor on such
matters. The commission shall consist of the
following members:
(1) Eight members to be appointed by the
governor, one from each congressional district,
with four members from each party;
(2) The state chief information officer as
designated by the governor and commissioner of
the office of administration;
(3) One representative of the Missouri
state highway patrol, ex officio;
(4) One representative of the state
emergency management agency, ex officio; and
(5) One representative of the Missouri
national guard, ex officio.
No more than five of the nine members appointed
by the governor shall be of the same political
party. To be eligible for appointment by the
governor, a person shall have demonstrated
expertise in cybersecurity or experience in a
field that directly correlates to a need of the
state relating to cyber defense. The membership
of the commission shall reflect both private
sector and public sector expertise and
experience in cybersecurity. Appointed members
of the commission shall serve three-year terms,
except that of the initial appointments made by
the governor, three shall be for one-year terms,
three shall be for two-year terms, and three
shall be for three-year terms. No appointed
member of the commission shall serve more than

SS SCS SB 890 108
six years total. Any vacancy on the commission
shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment.
3. The members of the commission shall
serve without compensation, but shall be
reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the discharge of the members'
official duties.
4. A chair of the commission shall be
selected by the members of the commission.
5. The department of public safety shall
furnish administrative support and staff for the
effective operation of the commission.
6. The commission shall meet at least
quarterly and at such other times as the chair
deems necessary.
7. The commission shall be funded by an
appropriation limited to that purpose. Any
expenditure constituting more than ten percent
of the commission's annual appropriation shall
be based on a competitive bid process.
8. The commission shall:
(1) Advise the governor on the state of
cybersecurity in the state of Missouri;
(2) Solicit data from state agencies,
political subdivisions of the state, public
institutions of higher education, and public
schools relating to cybersecurity;
(3) Make recommendations to reduce the
state's risk of cyber attack and to identify
best practices for the state to work offensively
against cyber threats.
9. State agencies, public institutions of
higher education, and public schools shall
provide any data requested by the commission
under this section unless such information is
protected from disclosure under chapter 610 or
is required to be kept confidential under a code
of ethics from a profession licensed in the
state. The provisions of this section shall not
be construed to compel private sector
organizations to provide information or data to
the commission.

SS SCS SB 890 109
10. The commission shall prepare and
present an annual report to the governor by
December thirty-first of each year. Any content
from the report protected under section 610.021,
including any cybersecurity vulnerabilities
identified by the commission, shall be held
confidential.]
✓